Drogba's not getting sold, he's out of contract. Either he re-signs or he leaves on a free.
I guess my memory isn't as bad as I thought.  
I just watched  this for like 5 minutes. 
I saw a "Vagazzle" vanity plate the other day
You dun good... in fact way too dressy &amp; polished for the drunk tourist slobs who visit the valley. I love the striped blazer against the slate grey pants (btw what brand?). Everything fits you spot on. My only quibble would be the TV fold PS doesn't seem to match, maybe a puff would be better. And that cig is ugly &amp; disgusting. Even if you're a smoker you didn't have to be puffing away for the shot. btw which wineries did u hit?
*through* a wall, timmy. through a wall.
"Never look up in a book what can be found on the internet" -Me
Would have been nice to know about this thread last night. Ahem :P
I still think it would have been better if they rebuilt the towers exactly as they were, but made them just one foot taller.
If you can cap a bunch of keeps and what not fast the exp is decent...but if you have resistance, then its not good at all
Confirming the existence of /r/Southampton. :)
Scout: 0/10. The obnoxious pose makes any judgement impossible, and nets you the default score of 0.  soldier: 10/10. All points given based on nostalgic appeal. The Nutcracker-inspired ensemble, reminiscent of Christmasttime as a child, is a loving tribute to good days gone by, innocence long lost.   pyro: 4.2/10. Too fetishist for my tastes. Obsessed with "cute" items such as the SfSE, Tyrannus, and Cremators' Conscience.  Demo: 6.9/10. The color on the Bill's Hat is all wrong.  Engineer: 9/10. Excellent choice pairing the Biters with the Roosebelt. Suggests a dedication to rustling jimmies.   Medic: 0/10. Appallingly simple. Suggests a dedication to dropping ubers  Sniper: 100000/10. Hamburger face makes the loadout. Without it you would have gotten a negative score  Spy: 2/10. Pairing the Col roule with the Made Man is stylish, but utterly predictable. 
I would definitely add our love to comfort to the list. We are very relaxed, want to be left in peace and don´t look for trouble. Despite of that though, we love big discussions (which usually don´t lead to anything)  I wouldn´t say that we are socially cold. Maybe we take politeness more seriously than other countries (in Germany I noticed a lot more people saying "du" than "Sie") and we respect other peoples privacy, but when I introduced my Irish boyfriend to my Austrian friends, they loved him straight away and actually paid more attention to him than me... It might be hard to make new friends in Austria as a completely stranger, but you just have to figure out when to talk to people and when not to. My dad is one of those people who just talks to everyone. He talks to a lot of strangers when he´s, for instance, standing in a queue, an elevator, etc. But he would never talk to anyone in the subway, anyone walking down the street, or to a closed group standing around. When we´re in a situation like that we do not want to talk to strangers and it´s hard for me to imagine than anyone would.   If I compare it to Ireland, where people are more likely to stick with the people and friends they already know, I have to say that Austrian (at least the younger generation) are more open to meeting new people and making close friends with them. We mighn´t be known as the most friendliest people, but that´s a part of our humour and unique charm, and you shouldn´t take it too seriously.  
They pretty much discussed your last point in the first episode when Katara convinced the White Lotus guy to change his mind and let Korra pass her fire bending exam and study with Tenzin.
*Flips Universe*  I... I don't... ow...
I see a snake, a scorpion and what appears to be some kind of root system. This indeed qualifies.
Boyfriend and I are down, so long as there's not a midnight showing in 2D. As of last Friday, the good theatre is only showing 3D and we don't like 3D. Sad day. 
"You like this coat? It's made from yo mammas pubic hair".  (favorite Chapelle show sketch evar.)
Please, tell me more of how some people like to "drive big guns".  If you also really, truly think that the killing of these animals, which he certainly didn't need to do for its meat to survive or its furs to keep warm, is justified, I would encourage you to read "The Lowest of Animals" by Mark Twain. Don't get me wrong, I love a good steak, but man too often kills for sport with complete disregard for the survival of the species being hunted.
It's the immature college students we're making fun of. High school kids are supposed to be immature.
he is the brovakin, brogan born!
I'm pretty sure they say "Play Dead" more than a little bit.
I'm pretty sure you're supposed to clear items off the floor, regardless of where it is so I don't see what the big deal is. Maybe Wade threw it a little out of the way but who cares.
Er, wouldn't that be just in the first circuit?  The other circuits don't have to follow each others rulings - has to be a Supreme Court ruling for that.
It is very likely they'll just replace the display. In fact, that's what they'll do - but I believe the part is much less expensive from Apple than it would be through iFixit.
You talked me into it.  I know, and I am sorry for playing hard to get...but it worked didn't it?
I'm about to graduate from school in Atlanta to move down to the Space Coast full time, and have been working there every other semester.  I do dread the change of pace, but do you ever frequent The Cove at Port Canaveral?  It's all restaurant-bars, but Milliken's and Fishlips tend to have the younger professional crowd, since they have larger dance floors and DJs on the weekends.  
Here is the text from this meme pic for anybody who needs it: &gt;Title: Today the AC in my black leather interior car broke... &gt;Meme: Fuck It Bill OReilly &gt;* FUCK IT  &gt;* I'M DRIVING NAKED &gt; ^[[Translate](http://translate.google.com/#auto||FUCK+IT+-+I%27M+DRIVING+NAKED)] This is helpful for people who can't reach Quickmeme because of work/school firewalls or site downtime, and many other reasons ([FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/qkme_transcriber/comments/o426k/faq_for_the_qkme_transcriber_bot/)). More info is available [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/qkme_transcriber/).
this would be great, i bought the droid 4 for the keyboard, but if they have a nexus slider it would immediately replace my droid 4
ಠ_ಠ
[And now we wait...](http://wutwut.org/2755)
Enough Paul Spam subreddit
Ah no hard feelings, I just wasn't clever enough to title it in any other way. Oddly enough, not too much of a Nirvana fan.
Ha, no can do buddy. Although the sunshine and warmth would be amazing!
THIS
"Hey Reddit! Look at this picture my girlfriend took!"  FTFY
Can I improvise?  A jet. Not a jet that flies. A jet I drive on the ground. With lazers. And kittens. And a crew. AND A FIGHTING RING! NO,MAKE THAT 2!
I admit I'm not a good atheist - I haven't read the entire bible.  But it's my understanding that Christ said some very specific things about who would get into heaven, and it only included Jews.  I do know that the Jehovah's Witnesses, based on the bible, insist that only 144,000 (or so) people will get in.  Beyond that, heaven would be in violation of the fire codes.
It's a great show only because of this clip ;)
You have got to be shitting me?  I felt like that programme was an advert for the beauty of swearing. 
Nope. I used a program that I wrote to make that. Does photoshop have filters to do that?
Is there anything left of her when ur done?
Playing mind games with Deadpool is like trying to bribe a bucket of spaghetti to be more delicious with a trip to Disneyland. It just doesn't make sense. 
I would like to know this as well!
The guy playing the video clip in the background seems allergic to dodging, moving around, or not dying in general.  Edit: To be fair, he does get better towards the end.
im glad i read this. how would i ever have figured this out? the man, i mean.
Huh? How? Apple, like every single competently-run corporation *or household* in America, uses legal means to reduce tax liability. I live in Japan, and I make damned sure that my income can be calculated so that it's under the foreign tax exclusion so I don't have to pay US taxes on top of my Japanese taxes. Same thing.  If you want to get upset about something, get upset at US tax code that, in my opinion, doesn't tax corporations or the wealthy (I'm talking the real tax rate--as in what they actually pay) enough. But getting upset at people for trying to pay less isn't fanboyism; it's just being realistic.
They play this song every five minutes on Alt Nation on SiriusXM.
Printed full-size on A4? Or the 2" square?
Embarrassing? I don't think so.  The best way to fight panic attacks is with logic. Ruling out that you do not have a heart condition or a horrible poison causing damage actually fights against the anxiety.  Your duty should be to find as many facts as possible to prevent future panic attacks. I know this is incredibly hard to do, but the best thing you can do is to not be afraid of them and just realize it's only chemical changes in the brain. You are not in any danger.  Good on you for being a scientist and separating fact from fiction.
Rhino, because its fast, strong, and has a huge fucking horn on its face.
After working there, I can neither confirm or deny these allegations. 
I am finding a number of references to a GM Sparkle FYI
Details on the FBM please?!
I remember having that and the Game Boy Camera and thinking I was the *shit*.  IIRC, there was a Zelda game for the Game Boy Color that let you print out certain things you found.  *Edit:* Yep, [Link's Awakening DX](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Legend_of_Zelda:_Link%27s_Awakening). 
alchemist
Here is the text from this meme pic for anybody who needs it: &gt;Title, Meme: Storm Trotter &gt;* STORM TROTTER &gt; ^[[Translate](http://translate.google.com/#auto||STORM+TROTTER)] This is helpful for people who can't reach Quickmeme because of work/school firewalls or site downtime, and many other reasons ([FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/qkme_transcriber/comments/o426k/faq_for_the_qkme_transcriber_bot/)). More info is available [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/qkme_transcriber/).
The ball could have ended up back on the Knicks side just as quickly as it left. It was smart to remove the shoe from the court, though still a dick move.
It may well be for many. Few women's studies or liberal arts majors are very disillusioned about their career prospects, in my experience, as they aren't expecting to enter into academia.
LOL [RELEVANT](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=2bqEn8AXzJ4)  UPVOTES
No, because being offended is not a violation of anyone's rights.
Only one side is correct, and evolution has been proven. It is accepted as scientific fact. There isn't any serious debate about it in scientific circles.  People used to argue that the earth was the center of the universe. They were proven to be wrong. This is exactly the same.  Have you noticed how there isn't any serious debate about teaching creationism in any other first world country?   ---  I say this again. Biology does not make sense if you assert that evolution isn't true. You can observe evolution in action with bacteria and antibiotic resistance. There is no secular reason that evolution is not valid, and science does not deal with religion.   If something science has proven contradicts something your religious text asserts, you either have to accept that humans are fallible and the text is wrong, or that you are interpreting the text wrong. The earth is not the center of the universe, and evolution is a proven fact.
There isn't a breakdown. Games are nothing like firing a real weapon.
Pedey putting up a hell of an AB here too. The Sox are really great at working pitchers. 
I usually say to them "No thanks. I'm not a Christian", but they keep coming back. All companies that solicit email have an opt out link. Why don't you guys have a ~~No Prothletising~~ sign that we stick on our mail boxes?
I would tell them that if you are compromising with them about having a shower in the first place, then they should compromise about having it a co-ed shower. 
Stegosaurus or tyrannosaurus ent.
&gt; Americans getting tired of it all and go out in a blaze of glory...shooting government workers  I hope nobody starts shooting government workers.  I have family that work for government agencies and I'd hate for them to be attacked simply because evil big brother fascist government boogymen.
This one's perfect.
My grandmom still hasn't used the internet. Ever. Why not just interview her?
[ok](http://www.wearyourbeer.com/images/Happy_Days_Sit_On_It_Red_Shirt.jpg)
Depends on how you're defining alien life.  Sentient, highly evolved, single-cell organism, fit our classification of life, a collection of intelligences... basically, what are we dealing with here?
Dropping an E and finding that silky material feels amazing to touch, being with a friend and telling them how you really feel because you can't lie on the stuff and the urge to dance to faithless. Those were good time :) 
any good recommendations for instructional materials?
iron dust and paper.  duh.
Alan Rickman, hands down. 
The Economist had a TERRIFIC debate concerning the TSA recently. http://www.economist.com/debate/days/view/820
cheesecake abs = One Big Ab.
Good to know that other people are still using the DS Fat!
I say get what you pay for, but there *are* higher-quality items there. I noticed this when I realized I was buying something I thought a little pricy for H&amp;M. The shirt is actually a little nicer, washes better, fits better, and will definitely last longer. Their hoodies are terrible though, mine pilled the fuck out after 1 wash. I would also stay away from anything that's super-low priced. Their colors fade quickly and seams rip constantly. 
[Probably more pleasant than a revolver.](http://www.huffingtonpost.com/2012/01/16/man-hides-gun-in-rectum_n_1208666.html?ref=weird-news)
My name is not shirley 
nope, i got nothing.  id probably do ear stuff instead, but that just seems to bother people when you take kissing out of it.  ill kiss when its new, because its exciting. once its past that, its kinda disgusting to me.  obviously i still have to do it, i just attempt to do it as little as possible.  
I dont know why you got downvotes, this is by far the funniest post in this thread.
The asshole in me wants to say: "Yes, use it to type out your next paper, no need to even proofread it's fantastic stuff."   The rest of me wants to tell you: "It just types out the wikipedia article for the term you typed in."
Arson is only a misdemeanor in the lower 48 states, right? Where's Saul when I need him?!
I fucked your mom in your living room, bitch was pathetic.  Your couch got more action than the Simpsons opening credits.  -Hollohan
I just meant overall.  Suppose your answer would be "indefinite."  LOL that's what I was afraid of ;)
OK you do whatever you want, although explaining or linking why you think Morningstar is useless would help everyone else here. 
Depends on the context.  A seatbelt that is "fun" isn't necessarily good.  But entertainment that is entertaining is, indeed, good.
Stats for **[FlowerChica92](http://www.reddit.com/r/Random_Acts_Of_Pizza/search?q=author%3A%27FlowerChica92%27&amp;restrict_sr=on)** on RAoP   ---------------------------------------   * 1 Requested * 0 Offered * 0 Been Thanked * 0 Given Thanks   ---------------------------------------   joined: 7 months 3 weeks ago - total karma: 2   ---------------------------------------   [report link](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FRandom_Acts_Of_Pizza&amp;subject=RAoP%20Bot%20Link%20Reported%20-%20http%3A%2F%2Fredd.it%2Ft0mtn) or [send feedback](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=interwhos&amp;subject=RAoP%20Bot%20Feedback!)   ---------------------------------------
that made me laugh.  I hate and love that fucking thing.
Hey, Eminem. I want to fuck your daughter.
Still following you guys how do you announce winners btw?
You really don't know much about Hitler. 
My sentiments, exactly.
You should try Torchlight  or wait for Torchlight 2
This is a very confusing novelty account.
But... Horse Armor!
A 3 Series...
That's adorable :D
As great as mine has been, I think the Raspberry PI I ordered might be able to replace it.  It is just the way of technology, everything gets replaced with something cheaper/better/faster.
it was in my high school actually everyone who graduated took a picture in front of a flag with they're empty diploma books lol
[This](http://www.gigapan.com/gigapans/48492/) one is pretty good too!
&gt; What do you suppose are God's goals? I can imagine at least a couple.  We're not debating the Christian or Catholic, or Jewish, or whatever god you believe in here. We're debating God only in the sense of "something omniscient, omnibenevolent, and omnipotent, which created the world we live in", and whether that proposition holds up, that is, whether "omniscient, omnibenevolent, and omnipotent" is consistent with "the world we live in".  Its goals, whatever they might be are irrelevant for the purpose of this argument.  &gt; One would be to identify people's true natures. Without the ability to make morally important decisions, then we're left short of fulfilling said goal.  An omniscient God doesn't need any such exercises to identify people's natures, it just knows.  I also see no requirement that God must be active. It could be a deist sort, who creates, then just sits and watches.
Hey, would you be interested in any of these games. Darksiders, Left 4 Dead GOTY or LA Noire Complete Edition?
A cigar thats commonly used for rolling blunts. 
Awwww, makes me want to play TP again. Actually, finding all 20 of those cats in the abandoned village was surprisingly difficult. I would always find 19 and spend another hour looking for the last one.
Meanwhile I introduced her to anal.
Terrance died (T-BAG) and loads of other things all mounted up and everyone went their separate ways. 
uh, perhaps a second monitor? although that is not really needed. specs?
Because Pinkie is so much better? :D
You really know everything...
Your post does not match the title format for this subreddit. Please follow this exact format:  **[H] What you have [W] What you want**  Note that spaces are important.  This post has been removed - feel free to fix your title and resubmit.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%23SteamGameSwap) if you have any questions or concerns.*
We won't delete it. You have used a huge space but your statue does not cover anything and it's really nice. You don't need to worry :)
You do to want to see it. I mean you do but you'll go meh when you do. Unless you like pale skinny bodies with piercings and tattoos. 
agreed, but if you think about the catholic trinity it sort of goes by that rule. god the father..giving birth..sort of to a son and death which would be the ghost. 
Completely agree. It's in my personal top five of all time. Legacy of Brutality is pretty awesome, too. 
Ive been verified by gonewild y do I have to do anything u say? If u dont believe me or dont like anything here, you dont have to b here go ahead n investigate some one else. I have more than one person who knows who I am to vouch for me here... Enjoy ur evening
Alex Jones is so irrelevant, he needs to get attention by attacking Noam Chomsky, someone not exactly huge on the pop culture radar.
My mum had one a little over ten years ago. She didn't have any pain after recovery, but now she's having some issues with early menopause symptoms (killer hot flashes, mainly). 
He just couldnt grab ahold of the situation. 
Find a sign that says "Beware of Pickpockets"
But partial knowledge is a completely different matter from total absence of knowledge. Not knowing many things, or being aware that one does not have absolute knowledge, are not the same as not knowing anything. Which is why I found your original paraphrase fallacious. 
I would rather call it r/soccer purely to bring in new people from countries that refer to it as soccer!
Triple Agent. Mancini thinks Tevez is playing for him, Ferguson thinks Tevez is there to sabotage City, but Tevez is really playing for himself because his family is being held hostage in Argentina by Maradona who told Tevez not to upstage Maradona's son-in-law Aguero so Tevez sat out almost the whole season but he managed to free his family so he started playing again and Maradona came to watch today to warn Tevez of what happens when you mess with the Hand of God.
"Every atom you possess has almost certainly passed through several stars and been part of millions of organisms on its way to becoming you. We are each so atomically numerous and so vigorously recycled at death that a significant number of our atoms--up to a billion for each of us, it has been suggested--once belonged to Shakespeare. A billion more each came from Buddha and Genghis Khan and Beethoven, and any other historical figure you care to name. So we are all reincarnations--though short-lived ones. When we die our atoms will disassemble and move off to find new uses elsewhere--as part of a leaf or other human being or drop of dew." --Bill Bryson, 'A Short History of Nearly Everything.'  This quote made me feel better after my grandma died; hope it helps you too.
If you base your actions on knowing that you have no idea what's next and govern according to your morals and judgement i believe you will personally lead a life truer to the desires of your being.  My .02
But then you're incurring the additional cost of extra TP used for wiping plus aloe.
CLG.xX_NA2_Xx
Oregon is beautiful, and I would love to live in the pacific northwest at some point in my life
"Alright I'll start timing you".
First, Xbox did not cover *all* users with red ring of death problems. Many users were screwed because Xbox summarily decided the damage caused was outside of the warranty. Second, the amount of PS3 failures is a small fraction compared to those experienced with Xbox. And third,   I see no rebuttal to the other points I mentioned. 
Bear Grylls would be ecstatic.
Just shouted POOPDICK at the TV. The puck didnt fall into the net though :(
My apologies Killfuck, however with a name like that I wish I was a little farther away...
Sounds like a fun night~
Everybody says there is this RACE problem. Everybody says this RACE problem will be solved when the third world pours into EVERY white country and ONLY into white countries.  The Netherlands and Belgium are just as crowded as Japan or Taiwan, but nobody says Japan or Taiwan will solve this RACE problem by bringing in millions of third worlders and quote assimilating unquote with them.  Everybody says the final solution to this RACE problem is for EVERY white country and ONLY white countries to “assimilate,” i.e., intermarry, with all those non-whites.  What if I said there was this RACE problem and this RACE problem would be solved only if hundreds of millions of non-blacks were brought into EVERY black country and ONLY into black countries?  How long would it take anyone to realize I’m not talking about a RACE problem. I am talking about the final solution to the BLACK problem?  And how long would it take any sane black man to notice this and what kind of psycho black man wouldn’t object to this?  But if I tell that obvious truth about the ongoing program of genocide against my race, the white race, Liberals and respectable conservatives agree that I am a naziwhowantstokillsixmillionjews.  They say they are anti-racist. What they are is anti-white.  Anti-racist is a code word for anti-white.
Mary Poppins!
fun fact! Walpurgisnacht is a [Satanist holiday!](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Satanic_holidays#Satanist_portrayal_of_Satanic_holidays)
Thanks for this buddy.
I personally believe that Lily will go into labour at the end of this episode.  I hope to respond to this post in approximately half an hour with the post "called it!".
This would have to be fixable with servers to block the original username and future ones by that user instead of just username block and ip blocks now.
When I was a kid, Lego were building blocks only. No video games.
Wait, did you think I was calling him narcissistic? I meant he spelt it wrong in the title of the texture pack.
[This is me face palming your response.](http://i.imgur.com/saVvG)
Ah Margret Atwood, still won't admit she writes sci-fi.
Dear Reddit, have you ever dated a girl with no neck and a beard before?  How did she react when you asked her to wear a bag over her head?
This is the one. I'll have a few laughs! Thanks… And now, upvotes for everybody.
Looks like the breakfast bar at Frisches!
Jesus Christ how often can you use the word conscience. 
Ill take a look. A "fitness program" is probably a good analogy to what I wanted; make sure I know the things I should know
I got a [present for you](http://soundcloud.com/tiki_lamp/inspectorpantherfull) with an extra [treat](http://soundcloud.com/tiki_lamp/inspectorpanthertrio)
oh aite i got you, it should still be up there though
I think the whole point of going out on your own is getting talent together and making wonderful things happen through your direction. That's the skill set of an entrepreneur.
Sex shops need to stop horsing around!
haha all the sudden hes like, "wheres the high definition button?".  that's the resolution of your monitor pops.. 
I'm a staunch PC supporter, I do not like McGuinty but I voted for him anyway. I voted for him because even though I don't like his politics I like that I can trust him to be a true liberal who is more concerned with his career than anything else. Tory and Hudak on the other hand would have been a highly entropic disaster
I've been a pretty solid keto-er for the past 2 weeks.  (feeling great, down 10 lbs from 291.6) I was thinking about having a lazy Sunday cheat day yesterday.  My girlfriend wanted Panera, and I REALLY miss the broccoli-cheese bread bowl.  Well I looked online to see the nutritional info, turns out that not only does the soup have 21g of carbs per serving, the little loaf of bread for the bread bowl has like 118g of carbs.  NOPE.  At that point, I thought about a Panini but I chose the salad that had 5g of carbs.  ROCK ON KETO.
You should have called her out then, or even took her in private to show why that's stupid.  Also, a lot of schools are already banned from editing wikipedia *because* of vandalism from the school's IP.
That event actually happened when I was in sixth grade, way back in the day :)  Im actually studying to be a teacher right now though, and I'd like to be as egalitarian as possible. But I might switch my major to something involving abnormal psych, where I'll have to be extremely non-judging.
Disagree.  They got hacked.  I need my fix...
DTLA 
If you can find it in your area, try using lump charcoal instead of briquettes.  It is made with solid wood instead of pressed sawdust and binders, so it burns more cleanly and with fewer off-flavors.  It used to be pretty hard to find in much of North America, but it's getting easier with the foodie movement spreading to outdoor cooking.
I went ahead and removed the whole arm:  http://i.imgur.com/wfLGi.png
That's NOT what the study says. None of the following are described in the article as actually being studied.  &gt;Reasons include: the victim shares the same belief, the same god, the same moral compass, goes to the same religious institution, they are the same race, and straight.  &gt;Reasons to not help: Atheist, gay, has an opinion directly opposed by the religious institution.  You and he are taking a huge leap and imposing your own, quite obvious biases by guessing the specificity of the reasons. It's not even indicated if the broad basis that Dr. Willer mentions were actually part of the study or if he is simply hypothesizing potential reasons for generosity.
LOL @ 35-45 min commute to the city!
I didn't know I could get karma for just posting my school's sports photos. You stop caring after being in the same district for 5 years.
I feel that I have a poor short term memory for syntax. It's never stopped me from programming. Another thing that helps me retain while learning is writing. In the past I would read, and try to remember what I read. Taking notes and writing code on paper helps to solidify the information in my memory.  How do you enjoy technical writing? I found this post interesting, because I was recently looking at a technical writing position. It asks for 5-7 years of experience, which I don't have, but I do have a CS degree. 
should totally be cross posted to /r/masseffect.  also, it would be awesome to have a face code as close as possible to this...
Find the guy jumping to his death.
Gone for me.
Does that mean I've been having miscarriages since I was in 5th grade? I truly can't wrap my head around this logic, or rather lack thereof.
Are you complaining about not being able to use "password" as your password?   Do you not understand why we have minimum security requirements?
$2000 dollars a plant? I don't fucking think so.
I feel the exact same way.  I'm a guy too, so I feel like this is even further compounded by social expectations.
I've suffered, just so I could return harder Wanna be the shit starter? Fuck around, make you a martyr
This is sick.  Where did you get the blank mask to paint on?
Where else do you recommend he keeps his keys?
i want good games.
What's the difference between a pulse and an orgasm? I don't care if she has either.
Valve is finally going to announce "Gabe: The Musical".
Asta suna ca o provocare. TITAN ATTACKS HIGHSCORE DUEL, TO THE DEATH!!!!
You.  You get an upvote.  I've been wondering how to do that for a while.
All he said was that he watched the show, not that he obsessed over it and let it seep into every other unrelated facet of his life.
Would a phrase with more than one word (Like "Betty Crocker" or "The Gay King") count as one word, or would those be excluded?
At first I was like, hmm, YAM skin, cool. Then I saw the switched green and purple. I stared at that in anger for at least a minute. I think I need to take my pills.
EST
Ya, it got me thinking how poor of an argument comparing marriage to basic civil rights is.
Most beautiful picture of the Queensboro Bridge I seen for a while 
Have you had a ffm threesome already? If so thats not as bad; be glad she is being honest with you, most girls in her situation would probably just fuck their ex bf behind your back.
Those were .22s right? I'd be really interested to hear the effect of the oil filter on a larger caliber.
Well they seem like a nice group of people who are proud of there country.
Pasta exists.   This is proof of FSM.   In fact, last time I thought I had no dinner, but I looked in my cupboard and saw pasta. The FSM was looking out for me and put it there.   The blasphemer will boil in soup can hell.
Yeah I know what you mean, all these puns are so derivative anyways. 
"With the first link, the chain is forged. The first speech censured, the first thought forbidden, the first freedom denied, chains us all irrevocably."  Every freedom. Every creed. Every gender.
He looks so cute.
The other thing.
My Dad did the same shit with my Barney doll. It was not funny. Barney is a dinosaur not an appetizer! 
You're right, he'll have to ult onto the enemy nocturne who is ulting on the baron fight in order to get there.
Gee I sure would like to know what it was about then. I certainly did nothing wrong. :/
Did you really just say that people with open relationships haven't matured and/or have a little sense of worth?  &gt;Who has the money, time and energy?  Who has the money, time and energy to watch movies? Do people have nothing better to do than to just watch movies out of boredom? I just like to read books as they make me feel safe. But those people that watch movies obviously are looking for some sort of cultural validation.   How does this statement or your statement make much sense at all?  I'm not bashing on monogamy at all, but you are painting some VERY large strokes over guys that hook up. Slut shaming isn't cool. 
I assumed that the dragonborn had to use dragonborn-y weapons. And besides, it said the courier could use Fallout weaponry. The Draugr hordes aren't so tough with a Plasma Caster and Power Armor.
Yep, that's exactly what it will do.
You're a poster child for birth control
geometry wars :D
* Piece of Cake * Let's Rock  * Come Get Some  * Damn I'm Good.  I remember this much more...
Thank you so much for your service and for servicing such a beautiful machine. 
Being aware of it.  The human brain has a strong tendency to see other groups as homogenous, and our own as varied.  It's only natural for these feelings to occur, but most people don't realize it.  You don't have to take ghetto field trips or read Toni Morrison or celebrate the life of Cesar Chavez-- but next time you feel yourself thinking about that race, remind yourself what's happening in your head: a traumatic event rewired your head to connect two conceptual groups, based on a flashbulb occurrence rather than reasoned understanding. The bank teller you're suddenly suspicipus about didn't rob you; your brain's misfiring.  You don't need to feel guilty or like a racist or like you're a bad person for being prejudiced, just remember that the world didn't change after the attack, you did.  
This kid had a good childhood.
I literally blurted this out at work and laughed so hard..
yeah nothing kills the feeling of being in the most sophisticated city in the world quite like watching the straight blokes at the next table excitedly show each other the scarves and shoes they purchased today
You aren't. I started to watch it once, but just as it started going I realized I was on a fucking pornsite and there were other much better porn videos to jerk off to just a mouseclick away.
Not a single Aela in this thread to be found.  For shame. :(  Once I got Aela I never looked back. Also, I married her.
I'm gonna go against the rest here...  I wanted to like this movie, but I just couldn't get into it.  I found it boring. Maybe I need to give it another try...every now and the a movie and your mood aren't in sync.
Neo! Neo. wake up neo.
Okay.
You can add a second submit link which links directly to the text tab on the submit page.  See /r/DEADB33F for an example. There are three submit links at the top of the sidebar, one is the regular link which links to the normal submit page, the other two are actually styled sidebar links which link directly to the text tab on the submit page. Just for fun they also partially fill out the form, although you probably wouldn't want this.
I saw Irie Love at the Shack in Waikiki a couple months ago. These artists tend to pop up at random places, and you just gotta keep your ears open. Incidentally I had no idea she was going to be there until I was already at the bar, so it was a bonus. 
I was trying to explain the response by implying that it may not have been a response to her situation specifically, it may have been a residual response from the reason I gave, that should have been very clear. 
Im pretty sure they formed in 93. Damn 20 years ago. I feel old.
It should be noted, you can get a paternity test in the first trimester (not from the baby-proper, instead from the chorionic villus).
There's always a collector's item in there.
Pretty cool, but I'll probably just cut a normal bic pen down to size and punch a hole in it to attach it to my keyring. No way am I spending eight bucks on a pen.
True enough; we have no proof either way. And hey, sorry about the downvote. I actually had a 'smarten up' moment when you pointed that out to me, so thank you for that :)  It might be a long time before I'm caught up, but when it happens I'll try to remember to look you up!
Oh Indeed. 
give her water and gum. they love that. 
That would be incredibly douchy.
My ex-husband had one done after we got divorced. He's got two more kids. Whether it's true or not, they said something about it being a one in a million chance they will grow back together. Trust him to be that rarity. 
What has been seen cannot ever be unseen.. *cries in corner*
I'm about to graduate as an electronics maintenance technician in the US army. Believe it or not, when soldiers like me are deployed and we aren't fixing Harris radios or SINCGARS we actually do a lot of xbox maintenance. A lot of the sergeants that teach our classes are superb experts at fixing the red ring of death and other 360 problems. I thought this would be interesting for someone to read.
The Ryan budget doesn't really do anything but slow down the increase in government spending which isn't cuts at all. As far as privatizing medicare for his plan is pretty messed up for all those that contributed to the system. Its not fair to attack our domestic welfare programs, we should be going after foreign aid, offensive militarism, etc. But I personally would like to see Social Security, Medicare, ect. be privatized or be optional, I don't want them taking my money and putting it in a failed system that I never signed up for. Also if you think its the roll of government to redistribute wealth from taxation that not the right idea. If people make money honestly, I don't understand why they shouldn't be able to keep the fruits of there labor. The problem is the crony capitalism that is taking place now with the bailouts and such, we just need a system in place that sets up a fair playing field for everyone to enter into business and make honest money.
Shh!
This is one of my most favorite replies ever. Also congrats on the epic weight loss you've done awesome!
Way to kill your father, Sir The Guy MoreThanRandom.
i'm not compatible with the bible.
It takes longer for netflix to get episodes of shows.
*clicks*   *Taylor Swift in first pic*  I love you. Have my babies... NOW!
Repost
I already got my RGIII jersey...  But mine is for Rex.  Cause I'm insane
It really does. It bugs me that people just hear "MP in God of War" and make all these negative assumptions. But those who actually give the game a chance and watch the videos and read the info think it looks great.
Still, I'd like to try at least once.
They have also been shown to use cars at pedestrian crossings to break nuts open.  [Here's David Attenborough explaining it](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=BGPGknpq3e0).
Fucking cocksuckers. The only people I hate more than them are the moronic United fans who were convinced it was "in the bag" after the Arsenal v City game. Let this be a lesson to all those mindless cunts.
If it's a date and she knows it's a date you're probably fine. If she thinks you're just hanging out, you're fucked and it's your fault.
Well, that's one way to show your love isn't it?  She's probably better off dead than to live as his wife, still a nasty way to go.
sooo, how rich are you?
FUCK THE LEGION!  Give em hell rangers!
You could get fired over something like that..?
Not quite what I meant. To oppose, they'd have to believe that the OWS movement itself is not productive or necessary.
Which of course reminds me of [this.](http://imgur.com/eRcZY)
Slow clap for you, good sir.
About like 3:06 in this, right?  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=S5kVfFWfrro&amp;feature=related
I'm in naval aviation. Still in flight school as an NFO student. The art/philosophy guys I know largely went into Intel, but some of my instructors have told me about guys who have gone through flight school with degrees in art, music...the degree is largely irrelevant. Majoring in theatre versus inverted underwater basket-weaving or chemical engineering does not make me more or less qualified or capable of flying an aircraft. Having a college degree is more about showing your capacity for learning and responsibility. Any degree can show that, you just have to be able to sell it in your motivational statement. 
ESPN brought a bunch of new cameras for today. 
[Why don't you tell me?](ftp://ftp.fao.org/docrep/fao/010/aj114e/aj114e09.pdf) Those animals are a vital part of the ecosystem and we've seen how poorly managed conservation of these animals can be and has been. When human populations kill and consume these animals with conservation in mind then there is no problem.  There's a fine line between killing an animal for pleasure and killing one for sustenance though. I see absolutely no necessity for an individual to fly halfway around the world to kill an animal and take parts of its dead body back home, just so they can stick them on the wall of their den.   We don't tolerate humans taking trophies of other humans, so why should it be any different for any other animal?  I don't even need to go into the damage done to ecosystems through over hunting or destruction of the balance of that system due to individuals hunting specific animal populations.
There are also Mexican Bus lines in Oak Cliff. They are about the same price as greyhound. I have taken them several times to the Rio Grande Valley and had better experience with them then greyhound.
The accounts likely have no knowledge of whether the email address is valid. They will each send mail to the address and it will be rejected / filtered. A few services might be smart enough to pick up on this but without another way to contact you they won't do anything different.  If you don't change the email account you used for Steam or other services you won't be able to recover your password or receive email about your account.
The NJ5 damage is totally fine. If it were any lower there would be no reason at all to use it. 
Oh man avatar is soo good.
Tool is made of four people. If Maynard is done then they may get a different singer. I refuse to think Adam is done with music at his age.
That is a very chill wave.
Your brother sounds like a good guy. It's always easier to blame someone else for your mistakes. 
Trundle is a ridiculously good top.
"the most primitive drawing tools available" meaning ms paint.
you sir are *too* kind.
or best?
based on the components and headset, it should look like this : http://media.photobucket.com/image/recent/gt4mainman/029.jpg
Got the "reach call" switched off in the options menu. 
You got plenty of those, I noticed.  So all I have to say is...
yeah I mean it seems like if everyone goes to the latest site with cool free fonts then things get played out a lot sooner than they need to. I like it but maybe she should not just grab whatever pops up in her rss feed.
Heros of newerth 
nice deal! also, i'd get cults. i have cults on my lamby and they're jizztacular
you my man have read my mind. i want her so bad haha
HURR I MISPELT IT HURR UPVOTES
Although I would never suggest shopping at Best Buy again, had you purchased a Samsung or Sony instead, this wouldn't've happened. Just call them directly, and they'll send a tech to your house.   This may be true of other manufacturers as well.
I'v had netflix for 4 months. Didn't even know they had an app. This has just changed my life. [8]. 
He is a Saltwater Neclassical as opposed to a Freshwater Neoclassical, a whole lot of post synthesis Keynesianism can be called neoclassical
Never play TF2 Prophunt.
[Oh god ... the watermark ... IT BURNS!!!](http://i.imgur.com/9W30a.jpg)
I need a gif of holtby sitting there as the puck sits in the crease behind him.
Oh?  They get internet skrilla?  You have made me into a sourcer!
Thanks everyone for the replies.
Lets not forget the Mustang hasn't really changed all that much since the 90's model. Its still the same basic shape.
Came here looking for this exact video. The white and brown cat is the good guy, the black cat the antagonist, and the birds are his stupid yet evil bully henchmen. 
Ok bro, calling bullshit. Come to the Flamingo in Las Vegas, show me your amazing dice rolling skills.
Go figure. I always enjoy those positive twists, much thanks.
Lol! David Stern is at this game!
I can't. Stop. Laughing. 
Why were you googling std picture in the first place haha
I think your "back then" is more back than 20 years ago.  I don't think there was a sense of shame related to divorce in the 90s.  I'd believe your argument for the 1950s and 60s, though.
Considering the timing of the Ten Commandments (right after Exodus), why wasn't a single one admonishing or prohibiting slavery? My theory is that there were two separate authors, or that slavery was an accepted norm 2000+ years ago.
[Hmmmm...](http://www.quickmeme.com/meme/eb6/)
Patti LaBelle 
[Relevant](http://images.tzaam.com/full/kb.jpg)  Also- Holy mother I can at least abstractly see why childbirth seems like a bad idea in your case- Don't mess up a good thing :P
They will find ways to give him more regenerations. They're not going to stop for such a technicality when they're still making money.
It's a very generous offer but I have to decline. Thank you anyways though!
Guy from the little town here (Orillia), and even though it makes fun of my hometown, it's hilarious.
Not at all, I was simply using my posts as an example that they were far up on the front page because they only had a few up-votes.
Which means?
Fisheye lens makes the tank look massive and OP's arms look frail.
link the paper the Nobel committee released when they gave him the prize.  go ahead.  i'll rip it to shreds for you.
Yikes.  You destroyed him!
Was the Macbook plugged into power when it shut off?  I have 3 mac laptops from this generation (2 mbs, 1 mbp) and the batteries are all shot to a point where it doesn't matter how much time/% is being reported as remaining on the battery, it's just going to shut down when it feels like it.
Why is it OK for right wing extremists to make up lies and assign them to others?
Somebody has a case of the giggles. :)
Can i give you 10000 upvotes
The time a game takes place has absolutely no relevence to whether or not its a sequel. BF1942 took place in 1942, but its the prequel to BF2 which took place in 2005, and BF3 took place in 2012.   Its generally agreed by everyone I know it goes COD4, MW2, BlackOps, MW3.. or whatever the order is. They use the same game engine, same physics, same graphics, the only thing they differ in is features and weapons availaible, along with their singple player plot.
Pretty sure you were made to feel like an asshole too, if you voiced any suspicions. 
Hey, hopefully the wifi works now. Let me know when you want to trade.
So much blue and red...
DAE think America is full of fat sheeple?lol
I really want it. Can you make copy's of the painting somehow? I would pay good money for that.
I think there should be a pointed difference between 'Putting Down' someone's trade, and Polite Assistance.  I've seen before like: "[H] MY ENTIRE BACKPACK!!! [W] Skyrim/other 60 dollar game", and the guy maybe has... like.... 11 weapons, half of which are untradeable and a bunch of crates.  I think it should be polite to these people to say in a nice manner 'Hey, this backpack really isn't worth that much, here's some polite proof, maybe you outta collect some more refined over the next few months and try again.', rather than 'Good Luck, Loooooser'., etc, without facing the Ban Hammer. :-/.
I^like^call^of^duty...
I've had the same Trackman for more than 13 years, still works like a champ!
It is not. Sound like something stu would do too?
I was messing around on xoticpc (this is where I plan on buying it) and I think I could get 1 hard drive and install the second as an SSD myself, they kind of over price them, I can also apply the thermal paste myself, I have done it before I my desktop. I don't need that much RAM I upgraded it to 12 because it was free. And it still stays in my price range of $1600. I was talking to my friend about this and he brought up the option that Asus might release the G75 with the option to put the 7970 in it. Do you think thats possible? I already know it would be out of my price range the 7970 is already $200. But is it possible they would do that? 
Oh. I did not see that. Okay. Well, wish them luck for me. They seem to have quite the idea going.
I suspect a troll...
How is that end not able to seat anyone for hockey but it can for basketball?
I think it's still a little too open ended. If this can be in the subreddit just because some or a lot of religious people think homosexuality is wrong, then couldn't every single case of sexism oppression be in here as well?
Somebody asked this earlier, so I will just copy and paste my response here:  I was sitting on my couch watching the CSI series on DVD with my sibling around 3 in the morning on June 26. I was in the middle of eating rice krispie's treats. There was a knock on the door, my father answered and two very large people walked in. My sibling went upstairs but I was asked to stay on the couch where I was sitting. That was when my dad told me that I was being sent away and that these two people were here to take me to another state. They didn't tell me much more information other than that I was being sent away for an indefinite amount of time to an unknown destination. From there my mother came down with a backpack that contained some of my belongings. I was forced into a car and driven to the airport. I was told that if I tried to run away, then they would put me in handcuffs and drive the entire way or force me to take a sedative to be more compliant. When we were finally on the way to the airport, that was when I was told what the situation was.
Don't know too much about planted tanks myself, but I started mine about 3 months ago.... How long are the lights on for?  Is the bulb old, could it need replacing?  I'm running a 14G tank with a 15W with only 6500K and it seems to be doing the trick; along with sunlight from a window, as in your set up.  Could your water parameters be affecting it? /shrug  Would love to hear an update later on.... Hope this is at least a start....
"I didn't know what to do. I was bleeding out, poisoned and out of stimpacks miles into the wasteland. Luckily I decided to steal doctor mitchells crutch earlier and I still had it in my pack."  "But how did you not bleed out or succumb to the poison?"  "Cram. Lots and lots of cram."
Well at least you are into cheap game development  Edit: Making games at low cost
It is always so hard for me to understand how we came from stardust but then I realize I also find it hard to understand how a computer works just using zeroes and ones. But it works, and so I have to be satisfied knowing I can't be an expert in everything.
Uh, hrm.  I was ready to pish-posh the official warnings as overblown, but this guy actually makes me more wary.   &gt; blunt and utilitarian repression against everyone who intends to take the difficult and less traveled road away from the rituals of useless procession.  &gt; On May 1st, let's create something no one has seen before.  Um, what are you planning to do on that less travelled road, mister?  The vagueness leaves a lot of room for things I don't want to be downtown for.  
I went with both of those for potential upgrades, eventually going 2x4 ram and (potentially) an unlocked CPU. 
I actually have an MGS manual for a black label copy!   So RE, MGS and AITD for Persona 4, Mega Man Dual Pack and Ff Tactics? 
Can you respond to the content?  CAPITALIZATION DOESN'T DO MUCH.  edit: just realized i am already sitting down. how about you...stand up?
&gt; then you're going to receive this sort of backlash.  What backlash? A ridiculous comment from someone who clearly hasn't had any proper education on what feminism actually is?   &gt; Oh no, not slut-shaming! Why is that suddenly a 'social issue'? Because it affects women? Just as women are shamed for being 'sluts', men are shamed for being 'loser virgins' or 'creeps'. Where are the feminists trying to 'change' that?  Feminists ARE trying to change that. We don't just focus on women's issues. You might want to take a look at the hundreds of other views and theories that have stemmed from feminism. Feminism is a huge umbrella term for many ways of sex-positive thinking, including the push for sex-positivity towards men.
Hope you are counting the falls on that rope.
The reason I brought this up was because I had no idea and thought it was really interesting.
http://img.photobucket.com/albums/v295/Hathery/cryptie.jpg
I was playing heavy for one of the first times and my friend decided to uber me. I was doing a poor job keeping track of my ammo and needless to say he ubered me in the middle of enemy territory with me out of ammo. Not realizing I was out of ammo, I kept spamming the fire button and ended up eating a sandvich with the other team staring at me and taunting. Haven't played Heavy since.
Yes, Radiohead and Reddit.
You don't understand, no matter age that is a rare accomplishment and always deserves praise. Because boobs, that's why!
I don't think it's pedantic.  I think it's a big enough reasoning flaw that it really undermines the credibility of what is otherwise an excellent point.
Front page with a spelling/grammatical mistake? I don't know what to believe.
The last black pixel is Day 1 DLC for only $4.99!
lol, unfortunately I don't think it works like that.  It'll probably take more than one punch, ha ha.  But what will you do with all that ferocity if your brain is damaged?  
I agree but I still don't really buy the conclusion. You can see the risks you're talking about with small dogs. Some, like [Dachshunds](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Dachshund#Health), became smaller but have horrible spine problems due to their shape. Others, like [pugs](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Pug#Health_problems), have breathing problems. However, these are all because of how they were selected. If you breed humans without selecting for traits that are detrimental, it should be possible to get something like a [Terrier](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Terrier), should it not? Healthy humans that are comparatively tiny, in relation to their ancestors, but are perfectly healthy and give offspring that are also tiny and healthy.
[Source: Italiener] (http://italiener.deviantart.com/)
backblaze.com user here too.  I don't bother backing up locally because what I'm really afraid of is a home theft where they take my computer and backup or a fire.  I recently did a dumbass move and deleted ALL our family movies.  About 100gb of movies from 1996 that I have been archiving and saving.  It took a few days of downloading at 4gb blocks, but I was able to get everything from back blaze with no issues.  What a life saver!  I should say that I also do backups to a 1tb USB drive and leave it at work just in case.  I'm in IS and have a Masters in CS so I guess it's just in my blood.
Should I try to put lube on my finger? It definitely hurts less when I am completely aroused, but it still hurts. A previous man I was with tried to keep it inside until the pain went away, but it never did. I just feel like something is wrong with me. 
Ouch.
It's in NJ? I'm definitely gonna go watch it.
check first panel
this guy lives in my neighborhood!
Another case of memes in real life. ffs.
https://m.twitter.com/arielhelwani/status/197112285179822081   This alternate link will work without requiring javascript.   This comment generated by an [automated bot](/r/link_unscripter).
I'm just going to use your words to rebut, because you did a nice job of arguing with yourself:  You initially claim that:   &gt;  people of sizes 12 to 14 are hardly overweight   then say that:  &gt; There is no such definition of "overweight" that ties it to the clothing size.  So...you just proved yourself wrong man.  
I didn't even notice the release date in the last picture. Thanks!
Like a gradual shift in the colour's hue or something.
Another issue that is relevant is your right to film.  - [In the US, the constitution protects your right to film and photograph on **public** space.](http://blogs.phillymag.com/the_philly_post/2012/03/29/photograph-cops-public-first-amendment/)   - For stuff like state law, [double check on this site](http://www.citmedialaw.org/legal-guide).   - [Filming a REVOLUTION a Tutorial - Your Camera is your WEAPON. OCCUPY](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=vUMPssUP0bc&amp;feature=my_liked_videos&amp;list=LLiNb4VJqK5K-O9VmsM8Pvcw)  - [Quantitative analysis of online social media in phase one of Occupy Wall Street (OWS Analytics)](https://docs.google.com/presentation/d/1spXu_uuSJXtYKvyWr_MpwXGxW3LCd7_q1HtK4acuS1M/edit#slide=id.p14)
Wow, that's the whole point dude. You're giving up all the bo uses asscociated with heavy barrel, laser. Flash suppressor, silencer or whatever for the ability to blind people in cqc. That's what taclights are for! Hell, I wish I could make the thing strobe to make it even more useful.
No, she would be 16.
&gt;And in reply to all those who ask:"Yes, I do really make these pens myself!"  http://www.pensforcollege.com/Pages/aboutus.aspx
This is not WTF.
I feel it. I may do the same as you, some day. Good luck!
I take a nuke and then another nuke. I point one nuke a few inches above the spider and the other nuke I point at the first nuke. Then I shoot both nukes at eachother so they explode just above the spider. This kills the spider and all other spiders within 30 miles in a millisecond. Yes I know, Genius...
Miniguns don't do much damage, and everything else there relies on blue guys. Blue guys are decidedly unreliable.  It's ok though, Noshahr Rush is still my favorite map. The AA is just that much more annoying now that its smoke actually works.
pics?
i used to do this until they expected me to pay for everything while they get a free ride...my smoking buddies were awful :(
Not saying this article is great science or anything, but I'm pretty sure it never asserted that being non-religious was an actual cause of the level of compassion. It was just stating that there was a correlation.
What's a bacon?
**BLOOD** Wasn't she both betrayed by Viserys when he sold her to the Drogo and a betrayer to him when she watched him die?
She's probably not a member of a hardcore/extreme church, but a mainstream religious person. Those people just follow whatever is mainstream socially acceptable. Look at the catholic church of today, aside from all the pedophilia they shift their views and focus to the mainstream constantly. It's how the mainstream religions maintain high membership.  EDIT: Notice how most the mainstream Christians will defend their religion when you point out crazy nonsense? "Oh that's just the nutjob extremists". Well that's the whole thing. If churches maintained their old views, eventually the vast majority of society would leave. The extreme ones do attract nut jobs, and they don't need to shift their views because nutjobs are their customers.
I lost a friend because I became happy and found someone I love.   He is/was depressed and couldn't seem to deal with anyone around him being otherwise. 
"Cat in box. Hmm, something different with cat in box. Wait, just saw cat over there in bed. Better go check bed... WHAT THE FUCK, HOW HE GET IN BED? Maybe he left box to get in bed, better go check box... OH FOR FUCK'S SAKE YOU'RE SHITTING ME, now cat in box too?! LADY YOU THRUST PUT ME INTO AN EPISTEMIC NIGHTMARE WHICH MAKES ME QUESTION MY VERY GRASP OF ONTOLOGICAL REALITY WHEN I JUST WANT TO SIT HERE AND LICK MY BALLS."
Dammit. Hulu has some very good anime, and other shows. Plus, you can watch it on Linux, which you still cannot do for Netflix. (That was a **big** plus for me).  I guess I'll look elsewhere once they make this switch.
Hmmm... still in the original wrapper.
I should hope so. How else is he going to stick the landing without a parachute?
If your fiancee hasn't called CPS you should.  No kids should be raised like that.  Tell them about the cop friend, too, so they know about it.
would you say it to her face?
Yours is a cowardly response.  Allowing someone to abuse authority, even the minuscule authority afforded a car wash boss over his subordinates, is not the right choice. OP should make contact with any corporate office that may control his workplace, and if it is an independently owned business, he should file a complaint with his local OSHA office.  This behavior is in and of itself a form of workplace violence, wherein the use of intimidation and threats coupled with physical punishment is being used as a means of supervisory control and discipline in furtherance of a workplace policy.   
As long as the American people can see the good NASA does and stick behind them.
Thank you for my new wallpaper.
Hah, whatever.  I try to avoid nepotism where possible.
I respect this, but you can't say you don't see the point until you get drunk.
minecraft reference deserves my upvote
Why skittles? I would have went with Oreo instead. :)
Khan Academy is great, but may be too concept heavy and work light for his purposes. He should get a good stats book, preferably one recommended on the AP syllabus, and supplement the insight Khan gives into the concepts with actual experience solving problems.
Well, a *little* offset. I'm not a girl. :P 
Baking on public computers used to be really practical when Pentium 4's were popular. Those got really hot and you could fry an egg on the CPU.
Not necessarily white trash. Its more likely that they're just drunk.
Agreed. They should realize that people have different dietary needs and are restricted to certain types of food.
I am mystified as to why people are upvoting you. You, sir, are a garden variety douchebag. 
Sadly, I also know that feel. But thats why you should volunteer at your nearest railroad museum or tourist railroad.
Australian manga art doesn't come any more sexy or sophisticated than this. Most of this tumblr is a sketch-blog but keeping digging and you'll find Amei's larger comic works.
Being a fan of comics but not the most knowledgable I googled her. Upon going through an image search, [Rule 34](http://i.imgur.com/FuccX.jpg) proved itself true once again...  nsfw
Epic, surreal and I hope that your local to me!!  Very sexy, hope you do more soon!
I know that feel
Thank You, Citizen!
in the books, isn't the wildfire plan more Tyrion's idea than Cersei's? [ACoK Spoiler](/b "Did Tyrion plan the chain or was it suggested to him? I thought he created the wildfire/blockade plan...")
...you rewatch movies and TV shows to analyze and identify bottles.   ...and only use media players you can view the video frame by frame with.
Haha, well I really like Glocks from an engineering standpoint and because I shoot them well and love shooting them. I carry a G19 as much as I can (pretty much any time I'm not in class). Since a G19 is my carry gun, I have two of them. I also have a "loaner" G19 which is the one that's in my car. The G26 is if I absolutely can't carry a G19. The 34 with the 6.01 inch barrel is my "plate killer." The G17 cut down to a 19 frame is another carry gun plus it was a great deal at my old job. G34 with an additional G17 upper assembly and 9 mags for $450.
I also just picked one up the other day, and I must say, it sounds jsut as beautiful as it looks :)
NCR is my favorite
She's quite lost, actually. She says nothing is broken so it's unlikely that my dog is in pain, but she doesn't seem to have a clue on what caused the paralysis. She even asked me if I didn't notice any signs of a possible disease before the accident. I mean... seriously? My dog was hit by a car, doesn't feel a thing bellow his belly and she's wondering if it's some disease. 
I think that the essence of brainwash is this :  1) We try to implant the brainwash without giving the victim any choice in the matter.  2) We implant ideas that resist analysis - by associating those ideas with a carrot-stick apparatus generally (hope for something good / fear of something bad), personal identity (I am a [fill in the blank], all my friends are [etc], I certainly wouldn't want to lose all that) and/or some kind of taboo (it is *bad* to question the word of *Authority*). Above all we try to insert the ideas *deeply*, so the victim doesn't merely say : "given X, Y is logically implied" - but rather says "I feel that this is *right* and that is *wrong* and this other thing is *truth*". An *emotional* connection is forged.
Tell me good sir. Where is the one capitol letter, hmmm???
I don't know where your friend lives, but here (near Milan, north italy) it's really easy to find weed, yet hash is what is mostly smoked, expecially from the teenagers. And I have experienced that weed is easy to find also in south italy, because of the climate a lot of people grow it. Hash is, by the way, what really dominate the marked, and that's because of mafia: the hash that they sell is, whe say "cutted" (tagliato) with eroine and opiates to make it more powerful and more addictive. And here they have almost the full control on the market.  Reality is that if you don't know no one in italy is really hard to find every kind of pot, it's easyest if you buy cocain or MDMA, but those are shit.
Hypothermia is always on my mind when I go outside, particularly because I base my activities around the water. In my essential dry bag, I carry a warm fleece, mylar blanket, lighters, knife, toilet paper and a cell phone. On the water, I keep a whistle and seek mirror in my PFD. I always have water on me, but (admittedly) probably not enough. If I'm planning on being outside for more than 4 hours or so I'll bring some snack food.  I try to prepare for an overnight when I go most places outdoors. And on the water, I try to prepare for getting wet, even though most of the time, I don't want to do either of these.
Where's that leave the Kymco People with its full-sized wheels then?
Not by a long shot. It's probably the least generic RPG I've ever seen.
[Checkmate.](http://steamcommunity.com/id/Ragorism/screenshot/486625304097652208/?)  [...Checkmate again.](http://steamcommunity.com/id/Ragorism/screenshot/486625304098098898/?)
Sounds like you got crabs.
Yes, but at least it's true. Besides, there's no true "definition" for stupidity. Being gay means sexual attraction toward the same gender. Being retarded means having a mental disability. Being stupid could mean many different things. It all depends on the context. I could be considered stupid because I don't know a whole lot of famous celebrities, and when others talk about them I'm totally lost. But I have straight A's and an outstanding ACT score. And then take someone like my dad who is not exactly "book smart," per say. But he's one of the most artistically gifted and insightful people you will ever meet. Calling people "retarded" when they mean "stupid" is just derogatory. You don't really know if retarded people are stupid, or in what sense, until you get to know them. That's my view on it.
I love this! Im not very good at fur either, but it looks fine to me! Awesome jOb :)
No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. This is not the kinds of content Reddit needs. Go share this on facebook.
From what I can tell, the precise timing required to beat the second part is so ridiculous... it made me ragequit.
&gt; Free Software is a failure in the vast majority of cases. If it weren't for fanatics like Stallman, it might have actually succeeded. Desktop Linux has what, less than 2% market share?  So you're saying that Stallman and other fanatics caused GNU/Linux and other open source software to fail?  Just looking at GNU/Linux which is a very small proportion of free software, you mean to say it's a failure despite being at the core of Android?  A failure despite running the majority of the supercomputers on the planet?  A failure even while it runs a stock market, medical equipment, military hardware and your grandma's robotic butthole?  &gt; Sorry, I meant to say "ganooo slash linux". Fucking freetards.  It's sad that you resort to angry words with such little provocation against people that like free + open source software.  Calling them "Fucking freetards" for example because they like to indicate how much RMS helped in making GNU/Linux a viable platform.   I hope you will eventually realize that most free + open source freaks aren't out to get you and we aren't your enemy.
That's implying that I've never been in that situation. 
&gt;So you think that a capable woman is just as likely as a man to be hired as a bricklayer or machinist...  Now you are talking about something entirely different than a wage gap.  You are talking about gender discrimination in hiring.  But in a job where lifting heavy stuff is the job, calling it discrimination because a male's body can do more work in an hour over a woman is bullshit.  If a woman can do those jobs, they can get them.
That's gross, I wouldn't eat those bananas bro.
Thank you for your warnings, and stay strong my brother!
[](/c08 "CUTIE MARK CRUSADERS ACTORS YAY!~")
Alcohol lobby &gt; NAMBLA.
Was that Stephan Bonnar recording the video??
please, don't be that guy
No, definitely Brainwashed. Actually, i should make a post about that. *goes to make a post about otakon attendance\*
:)
He looks...mad about something.  I don't know, I may be reading into it a bit.
Note - most of the people home for a 2:30 PM Monday kickoff are high school students....so, yeah.
I'm surprised he was able to fight in the war while pushing the wheelbarrow holding his nuts off the ground.
che romantica, eh?
Are you proposing to never again sleep with another woman?
I've heard a few people suggest Fraps.
Pacers fans (aka Indy in general) have been disinterested all year.  We had bottom 5 average attendance
I guess so. I'll go away now cause I am useless.
He really does know everything about baseball. I love him.
Then all is well in Skyrim.
&gt;but does he need to show off so much?  we have a sample of one picture of this guy doing this.  &gt;Guys like this are the reason so many people just stay away from gyms because they feel so inadequate  no. the people themselves and their shitty self esteem that derives from their lazy fat asses is why they stay away from the gym. nobody at a gym really cares about you. they're there to work out. if you go there, it's so you can work out. that's about it. pretty simple.
Doesn't make vsync a resource hog.  In fact Legend of Grimrock (if you haven't played, play) *is* a resource hog and will let your GPU work it's ass off pumping out as many frames per second as possible which can heat the shit out of you card. Turning vsync on will cap the FPS and the game runs nice and cool.
&gt;I'm not even going to list all the players that we need to get rid of..........  We have a lot of dead weight that we can offload.  We just need to find buyers.
Some loves just weren't meant to tree
I'd hope that fuck trophy came out so hard it ripped her in half. Justice.
The Subaru crowd has plenty of ricers.
I understand what your trying to say, but you cant heal him while he's cycloned and couldnt heal him if he activated bkb
You explained it perfectly. 
I had no issues doing mace/shield and greatsword as a Guardian.   I had to pay *much* more attention to what was going on around me as melee than when I had a staff or scepter out, but I had no issues staying up if I was careful. Yes, sometimes I needed to step back if I messed up and took a big hit. Yes, sometimes I couldn't really control where the monster was going next - but unless I never felt like it was impractical.*  And in pvp? Guardian worked exactly as advertised, I could routinely handle being outnumbered 2 to 3 on 1 at an objective long enough for support to arrive and save the node.  *that said, I didn't have access to rifles, so maybe the issue is rifle is too good and not that melee sucks?
You could start at the third book and things would still make sense and all, but I just don't understand why the hell you would do that.
Bob Mould better *after* Hüsker Dü?  /twitch
I'm not taking it too personally, I'm just confused by that kind of behavior.  If I'm not interested in someone, I don't go out of my way to make plans with them. 
Yes. You are overreacting. 
and he forgot his notebook!
You couldn't be more correct!
Some things I see people do inspire me to to improve.   This was so amazing I actually started feeling despondent! 
I was walking into the room with a drink when this thing appeared on screen. Scared the crap out of me and I spilled my soda.
Saved that.  Thanks.
The only experience I've ever had with a Netgear WNA1000 .... it was doing the exact same thing yours is doing.. and it ended up being a bad/failing adapter. 
Well, he is my favorite, by far :D
Similarly to what's been said, I really doubt it would have to change much. Apple would just throw the price up by a couple hundred dollars because they can.
Im not usually much for this heavy shit, but damn its good
"Evangelism?  But I'm afraid of people and don't trust Jesus to help me!"  -Tracts: Evangelism for Cowards.
&gt; In fact, the overwhelming majority of hunters do it for tradition, not for food.  source?
While we're waiting we can explore the sea.  There are still depths that haven't been reached.
Priss?  Priss everywhere?!
$108.56
Launch day xboxes had a white tray not a silver. 
Alright, I think I've responded to much of that, albeit not directly, but I will take a shot at it here:  &gt;We're left dealing with the consequences via "charity," another human invention which is by nature inefficient and wasteful.  The most efficient form of charity is through friends and family.  And they will often help you out if you get into trouble.  The more local the charity, the better the results.  Soup kitchens, homeless shelters, etc. are much better than sending money across the country or world.  Perfection is impossible, but we can do much better if we are smart about it.  Further, much of the problems that people get into are due to government interference.  Healthcare and higher education is expensive *because of* government subsidies and financial aid schemes.  Homes are more expensive in many areas because of government controls.  Jobs are more unavailable because of government limitations on competition and onerous/expensive taxes and regulations.  &gt;A business will try to submit false evidence, or keep behavior secret, rather than admit to having harmed a human being.  They would do the same thing in government courts.  Private arbitration can take the same measures as government courts.  If they don't agree to private arbitration, the community would ostracize them (boycotts, social pressure, etc.) for not treating others like human beings.  &gt;As human beings (not economic creatures), there is a moral mandate to somehow artificially increase the economic value of economically valueless people just barely enough to "keep them in business," meaning to artificially protect their basic health, survival, and opportunity to become a "better business" in the future.  Yes, we ought to help out those that are stuck in dangerous circumstances, if we can.  But we have no right or authority to make others do the same, even if we know they should.  Here, [this short video makes the point pretty well](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=PGMQZEIXBMs).
It looks almost completely useless. There may be an infection.
You have to act like you've been there before. Like you know exactly what the context is and where it can possibly head. Be calm and secure and don't react like a child on Christmas. Play into that frame and work it confidently, like its nothing and you know what the fuck you are doing.   But, if you have to shift into actor mode, she'll see right through it. Just relax, the vibe is sexual, and work naturally toward that end. 
Oh, I thought we were talking about black culture in America. I had no idea you were talking black culture in Africa. There's a bit of a difference. You act as if there is something wrong with black culture. That's the most telling part of our conversation. You have a problem with black culture. You don't like it. Apparently a black person embracing their culture is an affront to common decency. So sad. You should learn to be more open minded. Don't try to make everyone be the way you want them to be. Just because they don't act like you do doesn't mean there is something wrong with them. People are different, it's very bigoted of you to pretend otherwise. As for the last thing, it's pretty sad that you think going to Canada to study Mexicans is a better idea than going to Mexico to study Mexicans. Perhaps you hate Mexican culture too?
...is what his wife had tattooed above her vagina.
Scarring is usually a surgical procedure, depending on severity. Are they just red marks? Those will go away on their own, but it'll take several months. It's just hyper-pigmentation.  Pit scarring is fixed using heavy glycolic acid stripping treatments, excise punching the skin, derma-filling, etc...Pretty costly. Red marks though, fuck 'em, they go away.
Why do so many high school outcasts smell like pee? Is this a chicken-egg style problem? 
Chewing gum in a church.
Every bonus question on my exams are just like this
I'm more excited for Raw than I have been in months. MONTHS.   R/Squaredcircle helps. Kudos to you, folks. You make my marking world a better place. 
If you would like to link me to some flaired users that instigated antagonism (*not* in response to you), then I would be happy to see them so I can take action.
HOW DID YOU SURVIVE?
It looks more ornate this way, just circles everywhere would look rather bland in my opinion.
Just soak em for a few days :) good as new!
you could go out into the woods, find a stick and whittle it down with a pocket knife
If the only information you get about American politics is from /politics, then I can't blame you for thinking this way.  But no, the vast majority of people who call themselves "Republican" are not racist. And ones that openly are racist are generally demonized, outcasted, or not taken seriously at all (and that goes for Democrats as well).  Remember, it was a Republican who freed the slaves, and it was the Democratic party who once embraced the KKK. Racism is not exclusive to a political party.
Not ugly. You have a very "soccer mom" type of vibe. Maybe it's the hairdo. I'd guess your age at 32-35. Hope this helped. 
You sir/madam are now responsible for the images I can't remove from my mind...
Isn't it kind of impossible to learn this one, simce it would stop being true once you do?
Ah so a "herd" of autistic people. I "heard" it means a group of rather unique individuals. Spell check is a wonderful thing. Perhaps you should try it. 
A side idea: Why not try to reconnect with some profs at your alma mater?
for sure man
This "debate" was civil, but useless. Ron Paul was given a paltry six and a half minutes to fit his arguments in, and ended up sounding like a galloping, ranting fool as he tried to fit it all in. Krugman was given a mere four and a half minutes to respond. Knowledge and understanding can't really be acquired in such a rapid-fire format. The best each side can hope for is that their guy gets enough stupid digs in during the time allotted.
[What this man said](http://www.sadanduseless.com/wp-content/uploads/2010/05/601.jpg)
Hamboning?
You should watch City of God. I'm surprised I didn't see this one listed already, but maybe I just missed it. 
In a Christian's view, the old testament is basically garbage. My friend says it's there to show how impossible it is to live to Gods set standards, and that's why Jesus sacrificed himself, and the new testament was made. 
It's spelled defense....if you're in America*
thats good for you. as a kid, religion gives you a better sense of right and wrong and scares you into being good. which is why i dont see it as a problem.
The writers made him a steward and left him at Castle Black for some reason.
nowadays a lot of games auto-adjust to "best settings" -- If I start the game with these settings, and it run at an acceptable rate, I will leave them be.  If I get crappy FPS I'll mess with some sliders in area's I feel are less important to my graphical experience to milk as much as I can from my crappy old computer.
Whoa we got a Bad-ass search over here!
Exactly! Thank you. He's 21 now and still doesn't drink. Not really too sure why, but he doesn't. And I don't know about the coke thing, but I doubt it. I don't have anything to base that doubt off of, but I dunno. Good on you though.
Me too. We'll take turns wearing the wig.
Hot.
No, I never adjust settings, outside of resolution.  Why?  Because all modern games are designed to run on 6 year old hardware.  My computer was top-of-the-line 7 years ago.  Thanks, Microsoft! You've saved me a ton on upgrades.
sorry i'm just imagining someone using college as a party vacation on their parents hard earned money, all the while creating the illusion that actual work was being done.  it's not over though you can get back on the horse and turn it around.
There's an xda-developers offshoot for jailbreaking: [iPhone Developers](http://forum.iphone-developers.com/iphone-hacking-jailbreaking-modding/).
This is true, don't get me wrong I like screaming but this is a little much. They remind me of [Dripping Slits](http://drippingslits.bandcamp.com/)
&gt;(The Matrix x 1984 + Forced Symbolism) / Logic= Equilibrium   FTFY.
Damn, I miss [Deadwood](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=PgaEYyIjykM)...hooplehead cocksucker!
If it makes you feel any better, I've never heard of you.
[Catherine](http://insouciantgazelle.files.wordpress.com/2011/01/catherine-cover-ps3.jpg)?
Love that you included a picture of the spot (insanely jealous of it btw) 
Thanks heaps! Shame about the comic sans, but it seems to be a decent site.
1920x1080 isn't perfect for any size if that isn't the native resolution.
I honestly believe that technological pressures will change human beings faster than environmental pressures. I'm only 31 and there is no way I could have imagined how technology has changed my life as a child.   I wouldn't be surprised if humanity was unrecognizable in 200 years, let alone 200,000 years. 
Are you lost? 
Sure, i'll carry you!
Reminds me of Heavy, in some weird way. :s
So what you are trying to say is you don't care what people think your intentions were and that you don't give a shit what people think you were conveying. Got it.
The only kind left: a restricted firearms transfer from seller to purchaser. 
Can't count the number of games I've lost to rage...my own and my teammates.  And yeah, always take the opportunity to learn.  From pros/casts/mistakes.  :D
Is there any goofier looking logo than the Baltimore Oriole? I don't think so.  Hee hee. I chuckle every time I see it.  /Although, Chief Wahoo is pretty ridiculous.
Is minesweeper included in the sample list?   Alot of so called "gamers"  are not playing what most of us would consider actual games...ones that have settings worth messing with.   I mean if the sample includes the massive amount of people playing farmville solitare chess and minesweeper...then its flawed data as far as I'm concerned.
The last one was just the given demand function for Q^s, but thanks. I see how it's done now.
My daily routine.
Betty
It is ALL true. The last bit is something I'm attributing to too many CreepyPastas, praying that that's true. But yes, ALL of these are true events. Still give me the heebie-jeebies.
i'll bite since no one else did.  what?
They appear to have retractable shades at the top. 
Couldn't have said it better.
I'm sorry but account less than 90 days old are not allowed to make monetary requests. We have to enforce this rule because of people create multiple account to game the system.  May I suggest [/r/charity](/r/charity) instead.
I like it, but I don't identify with the rainbow flag. Anyone with me on this?
Cool.  This is how I feel at times.
I always imagined he was quite the sir sporting a spectacle. (If that is what it is actually called)
A step stool for you my short friend.  Edit - I can't figure out how to format a step stool properly. But the effort was there...
I liked the fact it was REAL pussy eating. Not that fake "for porn" look. The eater and the eatee were really into it.. NICE FIND!
Upvote!  Nice and classy
Ashe and Sivir are dirt cheap and quite good (Ashe more so than Sivir right now, but Sivir isn't bad by any means). Urgot is 3150 IP I believe, and very strong, but he's not like any other AD in that he builds tanky CDR and is focused on shutting down the enemy carry instead of carrying himself. Looking at the numbers, it's kind of sad how there are only 2 AD carries + Urgot under 6300, unless I missed one. Edit: And yes, I did. Forgot Corki wasn't 6300, he's very strong, has a lot of burst potential. Don't know how I missed Tristana; she's weaker than most carries early on, but has the potential for some nice burst, and gets very strong lategame.
So when does the skin tier list come out ?
I don't really care. But it would be good to find a pic that was more horizontal so people could see. 
Thanks! I appreciate the help and all, but I kind of figured it out, thanks to someone on DeviantArt who was helping a lot of people. [Here is the finished product.](http://i.imgur.com/CD00d.jpg) I know the text I put there is crap, but I'm kind of a "Noob" when it comes to text tools.
***arielhelwani***:  &gt;&amp;#91;2012/04/30&amp;#93;&amp;#91;23:56:45&amp;#93;  &gt;[&amp;#91;Translate&amp;#93;](http://translate.google.com/#auto|auto|Earlier today, my wife gave birth to a beautiful, healthy baby boy. Amazing. 9 lbs, 4 oz. What a feeling finally meeting this little guy. 'google translate this tweet'): Earlier today, my wife gave birth to a beautiful, healthy baby boy. Amazing. 9 lbs, 4 oz. What a feeling finally meeting this little guy.  [&amp;#91;This comment was posted by a bot&amp;#93;&amp;#91;FAQ&amp;#93;](http://www.reddit.com/r/tweet_poster/faq 'tweet_poster')[&amp;#91;Did I get it wrong?&amp;#93;](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=tweet_poster&amp;subject=Error%20Report&amp;message=[Oops!](http://reddit.com/r/MMA/comments/t0nb4\)%0d%0dPlease leave the subject and this link unaltered, but feel free to add a description here. 'report an error')
&gt;[Ford also sent over this graphic showing the power curves of the Shelby.](http://autos.yahoo.com/blogs/motoramic/2013-ford-shelby-gt500-confirmed-662-hp-love-192449470.html)
Damn.
facebook asked me the other day who the space invaders were on my shirt. Made me lol pretty hard!
whadja think? i thought it was pretty good, though i forgot all the exact dates. 
For "basketball reasons".
Upvoting because this was so nerdy that I chuckled. Thx for teh lul :P
yes. All of the light gauntlets actually have perfect base, but that is lost when you up it and its rerolled with the new base. 
Ballon. Balloff.
6850 or 6870.
5329-6439-4006
I think that's why its posted under funny
wouldn't change it for anything
Ever heard of a *newsflash*?  That's how the Queen's death will be announced.
There are lots of brazilian flags in the image but your task, should you choose to accept it, is to locate the german flag. 
Cough drops are just a temporary symptom mitigator. They do not assist in eliminating the cause. You can omit them from your list.
fo real. 200 a pipe?  Find a way to mass produce them, sell like 40 each  ???  PROFIT
&gt; [Mandatory "CLG can't even motivate the first team properly" comment]  Eh. Maybe its more of a reason to have a "B Team" - They can see another team being motivated.
There are smaller condoms, but they give them names so you don't feel bad.
My first thought....Who still has AOL floppies
Personally, I think you should just be able to access the Bank and Trading Post pick-up from anywhere inside a city. It's free to waypoint to the NPCs anyway, so it's just an inconvenience for no particular reason.
What does the gender of the abuser have to do with the fact that the majority of the victims are male?  If, for example, I told you that every day:  15 men kill 15 men and 5 women. 10 women kill 10 men.  Does the fact that more men (15 compared to 10) are murderers have *any* bearing on the fact that more men (25 compared to 5) are victims of murder?  I'll see if I can find you some statistics (the above were made up) - but I repeat, there is no justifiable correlation between the two, much less one that could be used to explain away why men have pretty much non-existent support groups, especially when compared to women's support groups.
she have any hot pics?
best possible response. 10/10, would laugh again. 
I clicked thinking, "couldn't possibly relevant to THAT". I was wrong.
How would you write a Kernel without C? What language would you implement Ruby, Python, etc in? I understand what your intent is- there might be a talk here if you can discuss alternatives. I have my doubts  though.
 People really underestimate the chi blockers... Yeah, they have no magical powers to manipulate the elements but this are man and women who specialize in fighting benders. They hate benders so much that they will spend sometimes an entire life time perfecting their bodies in order to take away all bender advantages.   They are not only great martial artists, they are fast, precise and know exactly what they are dealing with.   With all that said, isn't Korra and the other benders killing this guys? On ep 4 when they raid the training camp, Im pretty sure most of those guys die. How long can you survive with your head inside an ice block? Or how about that chick who got crushed by a huge block of stone against the wall.
I have like 0 Luck LOL everytime im to late or didnt get chosen :/ q.q
Oh, i thought you meant an app that warned you when you were near areas known for prostitution or drug dealers and other such "unethical" behaviours.  "Warning: there's some hookers nearby, you might want to leave lest someone may see you... Or just be discreet about it"
or the green sport optimos are great to roll with.
Adbusters didn't even make the call, much less participate on the ground. You don't know what you're talking about.
Michael weston just attaches a flaming rag to the propane tank before he shoots
I started to read your comment, but it got boring really fucking fast.
It happens to the best of people. Just keep giving if you feel like it and perhaps your generous spirit will influence them. Most likely in ways you will never see but think of it like a pyramid scheme. You give which may cause them to give which in turn may inspire more giving. 
Well, I'll have to give it a go then. :) Thanks to both of you for the advice!
I agree... Thanks ;)
http://www.reddit.com/r/summonerschool/comments/qx92c/new_to_summoner_school_click_here/
I don't get it.
Yeah, if Torrhen's Square is already taken they skipped all the scenes near the beach so we'll probably never see it again.
Nah, sky will buy the stream from the Heineken Cup I believe, and that will have been contracted out to some French crowd.  Considering the matrix shit from the Stade de France I had quite high hopes for the camera work.
If you want to skip the preliminaries, the death camps are that way ---&gt;
lol ;P The book was selling out, I didnt want to risk it so I had to pick fast. This time around, this is not a problem as I have the gift in hand lets say and can give it to anyone in the world without shipping ;)  So, the choice is:   -give it to the first correct guess -give it to one of the correct guesses; picked at random.  What will it be Madridistas?
The buildings are mostly made up of air people! Due to the fire, mostly hot air. Trust me I would know.
Upvotes for mentioning amendment one. 
Thanks. I'll keep you informed about any relevant breeding projects... :)
Man I'm in the same boat, loading up for D3. Not as much as you, but still loading up :D
Last I checked that mod was buggy as fuck.
Depends on the complexity of said life form. Alien civilization: changes everything. Alien bacteria: may result in some breakthroughs in biology and chemistry that would later translate to some real world applications. 
the thing is, if they do the free transfers first, it gives people a choice as to where they want to go. with merges, you're stuck on a server that you may not have wanted to be on.  my 1 hope is that they merge unbalanced servers together. 
If the place doesn't have any platforms where else should he do cleans?
Originally was going for white, store was out of white 32s so i went with the black. My gf has the white and while i like the way it looks, i think the black does indeed provide a better functional border. I keep mine in a griffin survivor anyway. 
&gt; speedo gun  I'll be using this as a euphemism from now on. Thanks for the insight. Since I started shooting the LCP I've come to terms with my pinky hanging off, so I think I'll definitely make the switch.
That sounds great! Just a question... Have you had sex?
"Mmm plastic boob"
I kind of like that idea. I value Portal highly for the one sided dialogue that occurs between GLaDOS and Chell, when GLaDOS is insulting her and what not, it is very interesting. What I would like about your idea would be the one sided dialogue of Ratman talking to himself, or GLaDOS, seeing as he is basically insane and trying to escape.
Maryland!!! I thought this was posted in /r/UMD for a second.... wonder who's doing this research... 
I think shows that republicans don't believe that their party is using racist language when talking about the president.
This has my approval.  I will need pilots qualified on TIE Avengers!  With this new era of gaming.  Just think.  Clans/Squadrons for space combat sims.  This is getting me all hot and bothered.  Im going to take a cold shower.
My understanding is admittedly somewhat limited, but seems to me (edit) UNlike most street gasoline trucks, street diesel trucks are not naturally aspirated (some are twin and some are even triple turbo'd) and actually do need larger exhaust systems to handle the extra air that comes in. More air in - more air needs to be pushed out.  I would wager if this was a douche cannon setup that it'd probably be chromed, double stacked, and the person driving would probably have a bunch of stickers to add horsepower.  Though, I will be honest there is a cosmetic component that it brings with it is billows of smoke at shows and tractor pulls when the driver changes the tune on the motor to force it to do that. Couldn't say for sure that's why this person has it on their truck.
Why not anymore?
It makes me sad that someone as ignorant as you had the good fortune of being born in the States.  What you really deserved, in the big lottery draw of citizenship and life, was to be born somewhere that the US was fucking right up the ass.   And please refrain from using the pronoun ''we'' and implicating the entire country in the fathomless stupidity of your opinions.    
I do urge you to watch season 1 of the best show on television, but besides that, the kid is about 6 years old and still drinking breastmilk.
Province? I say the noble crapplalan nation deserves to be a grand duchy at least!
http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pubmed/17291597 This test found lavender and rosemary to induce Free Radical Scavenging which lowered the cortisol level. Cortisol is a neuro-chemical associated with stress. Less of it, less stress.   http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pubmed/20184043 This test: "Compared with placebo, jasmine oil caused significant increases of breathing rate, blood oxygen saturation, and systolic and diastolic blood pressure. . .At the emotional level, subjects in the jasmine oil group rated themselves as more alert, more vigorous and less relaxed than subjects in the control group."  http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pubmed/22171285 Studies indicate that Cymbopogon citratus (Lemongrass) possesses various pharmacological activities such as anti-amoebic, antibacterial, antidiarrheal, antifilarial, antifungal and anti-inflammatory properties. Various other effects like antimalarial, antimutagenicity, antimycobacterial, antioxidants, hypoglycemic and neurobehaviorial have also been studied.  Most of the effects seem to be related to neurochemicals but topical application can create some localized effects. That's Aromatherapy massage. They can also affect cell reproduction in various ways.  Like Bergamot, http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pubmed/21878361
No games on FSC anymore. They lost the contract this year to NBC/NBC-Sports.  National MLS broadcasts are on NBC/NBC-Sports, ESPN2, and Galavision (en Espanol).  It's a good thing. FSC never treated MLS as anything more than a bastard step child that they had to put up with every once in a while. NBC at least gives the league the kind of treatment it deserves.
Dibs
The way space commendations are awarded has indeed changed. You no longer get any for the space mission itself, but the number rewarded by the daily missions has been increased to compensate, i.e. you gain the same number of commendations from doing the space dailies as you would have before 1.2. However, you can no longer grind the same space mission multiple times per day to accumulate commendations.  I'm guessing they made the change because you can now get rare crafting materials for your space comms.
Lyoto is going to fuck him up.  
Discord is that you?  /bronie/
Did you know you're an arse?
Well, Breaking Bad is, generally, a better show.   BTW ... Season Four will melt your brain.  
Just scroll over their username and click +friend.
Ne'er
You're better than RAPS_COMMENTS_WELL.
That was a pretty good scrap.
Fuck off, at least the absolute shitbag you're running around with has one friend in the world.
You're an idiot. Your opinion isn't relevant to anything ever. Go away.
Most of the Zelda songs from all of the games can be found (and downloaded for free) from [Zelda Reorchestrated](http://www.zreomusic.com/listen). I listen to them every day at work.
Yes, that's absolutely okay.
haha oh well good luck finding the right guy for a fun night ;)
Guys don't forget to upvote these threads so they appear in the front page for other /r/Dodgers subscribers.
You are just being hyper attentive and it's easy to tell because a long and dark inner labia or big nipples is something that I can't imagine being something embarassing.  I give this advice as a male, maybe it will be helpful. Half of your "bad" attributes are only bad in your mind. Big nipples are nice. A bigger labia.. well if you would allow me to be graphic for a moment a bigger labia is more to play with and suck on.. shit if anything thats a great thing. Those are not issues, their not even non-issues, they are very attractive touches IMHO.  At first when I was thinking of responding I was going to tell you that it's all in your head but then since you have already been told that I thought if I take it from another angle maybe things will be supplemental.  You have nothing to be embarassed about. If anything you should be proud, your quite lucky really.
Was this guy's name Ricky and did have frients named Julian and Bubbles?
wow
A person having the beauty and body that she has, but not getting into it is not unlike a person who owns a supercar but drives under the speed limit. She should be at least a little more of a pornstar, especially if she is going to do a damn sextape.
Not really. She is ok, but only in the face a little.
I don't know, but that's *awesome*.
Another issue that is relevant is your right to film.  - [In the US, the constitution protects your right to film and photograph on **public** space.](http://blogs.phillymag.com/the_philly_post/2012/03/29/photograph-cops-public-first-amendment/)   - For stuff like state law, [double check on this site](http://www.citmedialaw.org/legal-guide).   - [Filming a REVOLUTION a Tutorial - Your Camera is your WEAPON. OCCUPY](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=vUMPssUP0bc&amp;feature=my_liked_videos&amp;list=LLiNb4VJqK5K-O9VmsM8Pvcw)  - [Quantitative analysis of online social media in phase one of Occupy Wall Street (OWS Analytics)](https://docs.google.com/presentation/d/1spXu_uuSJXtYKvyWr_MpwXGxW3LCd7_q1HtK4acuS1M/edit#slide=id.p14)
snubble?
Now that is a cool guy.Probably a fan of the show.
Well commercial business pays more money, a lot more money.  I have a top secret clearance, and experience in the military.  All govt business programs hire cleaning companies.  With my resources I think I am able to provide escorts with clearances for my cleaning crews.  Sure residential is easier, but why limited yourself?  I'm asking about the pricing metric for cleaning contracts.
Who is Bressie? But on a serious note, you're very cute, but I don't think you're sexy. Edit: I lied. You are sexy.
WHAT THE FUCK IS THIS SUPPOSED TO MEAN?!?!?  After sifting through an entire thread of people talking about HL EP:3 I am still no closer to knowing what the hell these two cryptic messages are supposed to do with each other to begin with, or what they mean on their own.  Can someone help a brother out here?
I've read that each major depressive episode increases your chances of having one in the future by 15%.
This is not WTF.
Look at the numbers he didn't cover up. Its not that clever, actually
No Country For Old Men
When in trouble, charge to something in the direction of safety while charging.  Then begin teleporting while charging to better your chances of getting back to base safely.
Yes, you are true. I used their clean looking new dynamic templates. Apparently they aren't that finished out yet, I expected a bit too much from blogspot. Not a bad title for a blog post ;)
Right, right, sorry. Eating cookies, wasn't paying full attention, you are correct.
I've used gasmask setups, and respirator setups and i'd have to say the respirator setup is better since it gives you the same performance but you don't get your entire face stanked up and your eyes don't sting either.
well. i know where i'm going on Wednesday! several of each.
Hmm maybe I read it wrong, I was on the 25/2.5 300GB plan too for 36.95, and from what i read i thought i was going down the 75gb limit.. but looking again yeah I think i'm on unlimited now, for 49.95.  Oh I see where i got confused, I read just their new plans, not what they were bumping me over too.  Ok so unlimited bandwidth for 13 bucks more a month, great :P. 
I made my head dress from a kit bought at the boy scouts of a America store. The kit was pretty basic so I customized it using fur and different styles of feathers. 
He is such a cowardly liar.   I guess he claimed it was actually him in the picture. Amazing.
upon reconsideration, i have amended your score. It is now 8.7/10. The Ol' Brim is vastly superior to the Armaments, and it was an obvious oversight on my part to afford you such a high score for mere Armaments.
As a total noob, this seems very reasonable to me.
"IT'S BEHIND YOU, FUCK!! GET IT, IT'S BEHIND YOU!!" -Me, Just seconds ago.
But Tenacious D is coming to play that day! I don't like choices.
Thank you Bloodthunder. Let me know what your players thought. I'm the show's creator and curious to hear any feedback.
Oh alright then...
Last year's meet-up was perfect. It should be very similar this year.
That made my day. These ladies need to be professional sex tape reviewers. Make a YouTube show of it!
I've had my Gnex since it was released on Verizon, no screen protector, no scratches.
Most of the jobs i've had were because i knew people. The one exception is when i worked for sears.  I filled out the online app and over the next few days i physically went in to the store to see if they went over the application yet. i did this until they interviewed me, and got the job. **Tl:dr** bug the hell out of the employers after you fill out an app.   AKA show interest in the job you are applying for
Then your mom is boss, my mom and dad used to think me reading manga and watch anime was weird -_-
Time to get my Swain on.
any place that asks for birthdate, i just skip the day and month, scroll to bottom of year, click accept.  yay, now im 117 years old.
Considering u gain all 8 Kanto badge...bout all of it.
I don't know why everyone thinks HL3. Currently there is 2 Valve games in closed beta (DOTA 2 and CS:GO).   I'm pretty sure that there won't be any HL3 teaser until those games are about to be released.
I think what drew me to muay thai over other arts is the fact that it is so stripped down and practical, yet still graceful and beautiful. I didn't want to have anything to do with forms or talk of chi. I really like it as a sport too. I would much rather watch a Thai boxing match than a basketball game.
cool
Thank you so much for this link so I can cheer on my Caps :D
If Christians have the right to give away those free little Bibles on every corner, atheists have the right to give away REAL books as well.  Sure, both accounts can be pretty offensive sometimes... But aren't both parties just trying to get their points across? I read nonChristian literature when I was a Christian, &amp; I still read Christian literature now that I'm an atheist. Reading = Knowledge. 
Yes.
What do you think of this jeans: http://www.armedangels.de/chameleon/mediapool/thumbs/6/89/Nudie-Thin-Finn-Organic-Strikey-Used-Jeans-Front_300x384-ID10661-c77a374da83f7830331915d69c256477.jpg  http://www.armedangels.de/chameleon/mediapool/thumbs/1/a3/Nudie-Thin-Finn-Organic-Strikey-Used-Jeans-Back_300x384-ID10662-5b5647fce4c7278e71e19d293e1b15ee.jpg  (only thing I dont like are these stripes at the back). And what about some sort of desert boots for me? Or Higher Leather Boots? Or White Sneakers (maye 2nd pair of chucks?)
It is super frustrating when someone starts shooting at me and I whip around, drop prone and then proceed to miss 100% of my perfectly aimed shots while they take the rest of their clip to realize I'm not standing anymore.  Thanks supression.
I read this as: "How many people have masturbated to YOU today"
never played but was always intrigued
Take this to /r/drugs please. (Or hell, there is this neat thing called [Google](http://lmgtfy.com/?q=nitrous+without+a+cracker))  But basically no, without a cracker you are at a loss, some try to crack inside a balloon but that's hit-and-miss and dodgy as hell.  Save them and invest, it's a one-off payment if you treat it well.
You're telling me that when someone calls your belief system bullshit you get hurt feewings? So let's take a long hard look at the atheists, Muslims, Jews, Hindus, Buddhists, and... And apologize to them for all the shit you've given them. It's a two way street.
I love to play with him, the only thing i still cant master is last hitting. It is to hard &gt;_&gt;
Exactly. My Mjolnir was bought at the Jorvik Viking Centre in York. It has since been used to weigh something down as a favour to a friend, been used to demonstrate an idea perfectly and at one point stopped a glass shard that fell out of a cupboard from cutting my chest. It even save one of my favourite tshirts in the same incident. XD
I would have to say for SAN's I like EMC support. Even their support website is hands down better than HP or IBM. HP's website is a mess, and i found my self going to the ftp site for IBM. EMC provides access to the same tools the CE's use for implementation, things like automated checklists, and support matrix tools that really work. For a smaller company Netapp is a decent option if you don't want to go The FIbre Channel route and just need storage for VMware and file serving. Smaller companies have has a lot of success with VMware using NFS mounts. I work for a huge hospital and they are using Nfs to move virtual machines to other sites that are not connected to the same SAN.
I see what you did thar
do you know if he teaches any other classes?
This submission has been automatically removed by the AutoModerator Bot.  Listentothis follows [strict submission guidelines](http://www.reddit.com/r/listentothis/comments/q0x6q/meta_the_listentothis_rule_review_a_restatement/) decided by the community.  * Titles must follow the format: *artistName* - *trackName* [genre tag(s)] *anything* * You *must* include the artist, the name of the track or album, and at least one genre tag. * There are no exceptions even if this is your own music or a friend's band. * Avoid gushing about the artist or begging for attention in your titles. * Try to use [Youtube](http://www.youtube.com/), [Vimeo](http://vimeo.com/), [Soundcloud](http://soundcloud.com/), [Bandcamp](http://bandcamp.com/), &amp;amp; [Grooveshark.](http://listen.grooveshark.com/) * Do not spam your music blog. Link *directly* to media. Leave your opinions and links to your blog in the comments if you like.  We do not accept these genre tags on their own:  * indie alternative remix mashup cover soundtrack score singer songwriter  If your music is 'indie' then it is actually 'indie rock', 'indie pop', 'indie folk', or 'indie electronic.' Indie by itself tells us nothing useful about the sound. The same goes for the other tags. Meaningful tags are *essential* for scrapers syndicating our content and priming the reddit search engine.  Please resubmit your post following the guidelines and it should be auto-approved within 10 minutes. We're sorry to be so strict about the rules, however it is the only way to maintain order in a subreddit that gets over 200 music submissions a day on average. Posts that break these rules would get downvoted to oblivion anyway - they always have.  The valid genre tag list is:  ---  electro classical rock jazz country garage pop folk metal capella acoustic core style hard soft contemporary swing house trance techno chill funk soul hip hop dub break revival psy prog doo wop brit baroque shoegaze beach surf blue grass bossa samba chant cabaret beat tempo cajun zydeco calypso canterbury canto cariso carol caveman celtic cello punk reggae fusion acid chamber ambient trip lofi lo-fi drone ska comedy novelty opera rnb R&amp;B dnb D&amp;B grind wave disco doom dixie dirge ethereal experimental avant filk piano guitar flamenco latin gospel gothic grime grunge billy honky irish industrial minimal impression IDM EDM jangle jitter jive jungle medieval motown nashville twee glitch complex italo skweee moombah crunk melodic retro afro balkan choral gypsy klezmer rap chip synth bouzouki vocal easy harp orchestra beats violin tribal dark liquid hammond lounge haunting agitprop protest western emo ballad spoken instrumental tango juke ghetto step balearic bit goa solo newage new-age world zulu noise parody polka raga ragga time riot rhapsody requiem relax roots rumba african salsa screamo showtune bigband big-band skiffle sludge smooth southern space speed stoner symphon tuvan tuvian turntab xhosa zeuhl EBM cumbia kuduro euro americana drum bass brass jam tradition lyric banjo low idelic anthem  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%23listentothis) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Yay VZW!
I don't speak chicken
Are those vultures? So cute though.
Probably not *literally* - I can imagine plenty of wars where being white in certain countries would be bad news. It *is* pretty overwhelming, sure, but to say that it has always and completely true is probably false.
No I really should thank you, you are a pretty girl and I enjoy the posts ;)
HENDRICKS DOWN!
Good for him! I love stories like that. 
Did you do this? If so, I'm so glad you're part of the sub now. 
Probably should've resized the images.
"Fucked a pint of ice cream"
thanks for the info... very cool mask
I left SPUF for this very reason. It's a very negative forum.
This is how my Minolta XD5 does it as well, there's a film advance release on the bottom.
Love it so far....  Always leaving something more to show, and with those breasts and that smile!!!  Love it!
Hi Todd!  I'm new to this reddit thing, registered just for this. Any chances of some in-game badges being added in the future? Or would those correspond to trophies/achievements to any possible future DLC?   I guess they would have to be patched in too. Are there any planned updates/fixes for a client-side patch in the future, or is just live-server tweaking right now?  Last one - if it hasn't been asked - why the name Mt. Eddie? Were there other great names that the team wanted to use?  Thanks!
Please *please* show us a picture of the wall, looking at it from the rest of the room. I would like to see the context.
Oh. My. God!
This sounds legit; I know when I fall, I reach out my nipples to brace myself.
I'm rarely in the Conant anyways, no worries.
You're fine.
The sheer amount of typos, grammatical and stylistic errors makes me want to cry.
I have never attempted suicide, but my brain sure does like to tell me it's a good idea. Seriously, what the fuck is that? Why is the thing that makes me think, giving me ideas and desires, that would result in it not being able to think any longer.   There is no god. 
"I purr therefore i am"  "By daily cat napping I have come to be"  Alice came to a fork in the road.  "Which road do I take?" she asked. "Where do you want to go?" responded the Cheshire cat. "I don't know," Alice answered. "Then," said the cat, "it doesn't matter."
Let's go with that. I think dream-grandma would approve. 
See comment disrespecting shitty meme; Make slightly less shitty meme to counter
Hanging* lol 
I shotgun the one with the most jizz
So who else just spent 30 minuets reading comics?
But wouldn't you say that for the time you were together you were happy? Wasn't that time together worth something?
I'm in the middle of converting to Judaism. The only person who has any problems with it is my dad who is an anti-Semitic dick. 
There is a sign up next to the Smith in my gym specifically telling people not to leg press on it, under pain of excommunication.
In the 2nd episode of LoK you see some random airbending monks... so maybe if you have the potential to be a bender but your natural element isn't air, it's just harder to teach.
None.  Take the shot of vinegar, cough a bit, chase with water.  Instantly awake and ready for practice.  
bryz was awesome when we had him...
Oh wow, my eyes completely went over the "info" in "DLC info tomorrow". I'm a silly sausage.
I would be interested in an iphone app as long as it is better than using  m.septa.org
&gt;Its a whole lot easier to stop going to mcdonalds and shoving fries in your mouth or even stop drinking booze than it is for someone to quit meth.   That is actually kinda doubtful. I quit smoking cigarettes a lot faster than eating shitty food.
It's even more frustrating because he doesn't sound happy or animated about what he's talking about just condescending and self-satisfied.
that's just the standard engineering school guide to approaching strangers for social retards.  "civil engineer" is a real job whose title does not actually mean what is implied by its appearance in this thread.
Cool! Good to have you aboard!
Ahh... Our if the mouths of babes.
what about a magical leopluradon?  &amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;
Oh man, thank you! I read that and just didn't comprehend a single word of it. I saw all the up votes it had and thought my brain had simply crapped out on me. 
No. Maybe. Yes.
If we start calling them that it won't be offensive anymore right?
I never paid, so no. It wasn't worth that price to me. For your son I'm sure it was.
George Takei can make anyone's day. He is that epic.  And I, for one, would be quite content never having seen a Salarian cloaca. Turian however? I could stand to see the cloaca of a certain Turian with a batman mask.  Spirits. That sounded a *lot* kinkier than it did in my head.
I'm guessing you're a 12 year old, overweight boy with a female avatar, wishing he could afford Skyrim, but can't, so is instead playing this on f2p with no idea of what is 'music' and is therefore being a pretentious circlejerk who hates on other peoples music choice?  yeah downvote m,e i deserve it; but damn everyone thought it when they saw this post.  also i don't like Nickleback either but I'm not an imposing pussy.
story
"Anybody who is packing up their stuff early is a fag." Sigh, it was the 80s.
Setting aside all of the absurd lawsuit stuff, I respect specialized because they make good bikes. Thats what it boils down to. 
I'm hoping they end up using Bluetooth 4.0. It streams at 24 Mbits/sec so I believe that would be fast enough. Plus it would make it easier to use the Wii controllers with the system as they were bluetooth also.
I want a good, gritty pirate game a la Red Dead Redemption.
...Good Lord.  I can scarcely believe the bloodthirst on display. Promoting *acts of terrorism!* These guys want so badly to be in a revolution, but I wonder how many would change their minds upon "shooting up guards at the Pentagon"-taking away fathers and husbands from innocent fellow citizens.  This is really disturbing. It's likely, presumably, that these posts are just frustrated venting from people who wouldn't go through with it. Hopefully.
Most of the champs I mentioned are already 1st/2nd tier, these are just the ones I'm guessing will hit god-tier in the next month or so
I had little to zero expectations when I heard we traded for him. A lot of credit goes to Magadan, he looks like a completely different hitter since coming over.
Disgusting, sexual username in all-caps? Check. 
Most funny dickish comment I've read it a while.
[That's one!](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1TA8oQsHqXc&amp;feature=player_detailpage)
Analogue study on 4-piperidone versions of curcumin for potential use as anti-cancer agents.
This
that's somewhat spooky...
Thanks I'm new to this. I had no idea that was gonna happen hahahaha
That is a good question and I hope someone who knows what they're talking about gives you the ammo you need to pwn her while she's eating a bacon sandwich.
Ohh sorry. I completly overlooked that on my tablet. Now I feel retarded haha.
Sweet lord, there's mail inside!
You should do alright for gaming unless you want to stream netflix and game simultaneously. My old apartment had similar internet speeds and I had no issues with Xbox live or starcraft online.
But Uni will be over by then.....
The father of one of my friends held the mouse the same way, and he always got pissed at us whenever we had used the computer, 'cause we turned the mouse the right way, and he was sure that would break the computer... Well I say computer, it was actually an apple, I think it was the apple 2, but may have been the apple 3. At around 95 however he upgraded to a Compaq with the Navigator 1.0 software installed (not netscape navigator mind you, the 'virtual' environment for windows 95) And he still held the mouse the wrong way Last time I saw him (2003) he was still holding the mouse the wrong way and claiming that turning it would break the computer.
Decidanse pelanas! :)
I'm still watching Disney movies ... :/
Incorrectly.
Jailbreak is Hussie's masterpiece. His magnum opus. I recommend you read it.
What does race have to do with it?  Yours sounds like the standard issue reply.   If you can't debate the issues then don't make yourself sound foolish.
I hate the fact that my tax dollars are being spent on things like ~~the IRS, EPA, FBI, CIA, HSA, NSA, ATF, DOJ, TSA, DEA and BOP~~ bridges, roads, stop signs, street lights, police officers, 911, teachers, schools, disability assistance, unemployment assistance...  Why?  Because *that* guy, *those* people, those *others* will almost certainly benefit from having those things.   --inside the Libertarian mind
Neville just above on the left? 
[Shut up.](http://i.imgur.com/tJnlr.gif)
ill volunteer
There really isn't a point, if you want to know the truth. It's just this old crumby book that a whole bunch of phonies _say_ they like even though they don't really understand it for one second. You can always tell when someone's that kind of phoney 'cause they try to impress you with big talk about themes and points and morals and you know the second they start up with that crap that they can't even tell you anything about anything _real_, like a baseball glove or a talk with your sister, or where the ducks go when the lake freezes over. They go on and on about all that lousy crap instead of the _in_teresting parts, where it's nice and exciting and all, it's nice when somebody tells you about their life. But these sad old bastards, they don't have a clue about what the goddam book's about. It's pretty dumb, really, if you think about it.
Went ice skating at Rockefeller center with my new (at the time) husband.  Went to eat at a seafood restaurant overlooking the ice skating rink.  Very romantic, enjoyed some scallops and wine...left to walk NYC.  Started getting severe stomach cramps and had the pleasure of seeing the interior of the beautiful Pierre hotel in Manhattan.  Walked through the hall, past a cigar lounge which damn near killed me and into the bathroom (thank god) with an attendant.  I had no choice but to let nature take it's course...many, many times in about a 1-2 hour span.  And every time I left the stall, the little hispanic lady with the towels, perfume, etc was still there.  AWKWARD.  
Government handouts? What's this? Let Mr Market sort it out!
My next bike will be completely bespoke with an open mold carbon frame etc, primarily so that I can have a bike with as little branding on it as possible.
I agree about the DROY.  The raw power and agility that pass rushers have coming out of college gives them instant impact.  Corners have to gain savy and experience before they can really come into their own.
I'm only 11 years younger than her. Fuck.
What do you use to photograph your makeup? It always looks so great! My photos never show the true pigmentation of my products, which is frustrating - it never looks as bold on camera as it does in person. HALP
*Babe  (Whoops....must have Jack on the brain...*facepalm*)
This reminds me of the old AOL chat rooms, I loved spamming those just to irritate people. 
It has
To be fair, you can be the most inept pvper and easily get that achievement. 
&gt; Also, I hope you consider this an invitation to keep open the lines of communication. Please feel free to contact me personally with comments, thoughts, or questions, if you so choose.  What a jerk.
I think another shot is....a 5$!$~@!!$ FUCK!!!
meanwhile at bot lane...
Your cat looks exactly like my oldest cat, except younger and with a bit more hair. Super cute, btw. :)
Actually I do, I'm one of the few who aren't addicted to reddit. I just care about the rules, unlike you, because apparently you know of and or see hundreds of reposts and you don't say anything.
Actually somebody just posted a drell vanguard guide on this board today. I'm on my phone but a quick sort by new should show it.
[I think this explains things.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=w4HH5K_LY6M)
Anyone going to watch that PawSox game? I might. It would be cool to see all of the minor league guys.
If you can find it, you may want to check out Watson Kirkconnell's *The Celestial Cycle*. It's an absolutely immense book, but it tracks nearly every single poetic and prose version of the Genesis story, specifically focusing on the War in Heaven, up until Milton.  Kirkconnell includes, translations, summaries, original quotations...everything.  I found it, actually, while doing a bit of research on *Paradise Lost* and the Caedmonian Genesis, as there is a bit of circumstantial evidence that Franciscus Junius, the owner of the manuscript in the 1650s, and Milton were acquaintances around the time Milton had begun working on PL. It's a really cool theory and a really cool set of coincidences, but no real way to prove Milton's knowledge of the OE poem. Still, fun to imagine him as a Saxonist.
Just re-watched the episode and yeah in that scenario it makes no sense to draw on her face.  Let's chalk that up to dramatic license.  But I do think i have a valid reason for marking on one's face though.
Ah, ok.
Then, [STOP IT!](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=BYLMTvxOaeE)  Seriously, stop it. 
Are you Scottish? If so, do you know what the general attitude towards the referendum on independence is over there? (Sorry for the topic change) It has been mentioned a lot in the press recently, but the only views I ever hear are from that ogre Salmond and various BBC 'analysts'.
Trying to use her homophobe as a reason to discount her opinion is just layering on the hate. You're no better than the person you are trying to discredit if you stoop down to their level.
I'm not sure what to say, other than I'm sorry and that I understand that he's stressed.
Damn right!
Me thinks you're doing it wrong, you're supposed to bite and chew not deep-throat it. 
Thanks for the descriptive thread title.
fag
Your new tag is Gilda Appreciator.
Thanks for the help, that is a great buy! If I get that then I get a dvd burner for free. [link](http://www.newegg.com/Product/Product.aspx?Item=N82E16817341017&amp;nm_mc=AFC-C8Junction&amp;cm_mmc=AFC-C8Junction-_-Power%20Supplies-_-OCZ%20Technology-_-17341017&amp;AID=10440897&amp;PID=3938566&amp;SID=)
Image rehosted on to Imgur from Dropbox. (BETA - [why?](http://www.reddit.com/r/DropboxMirror/comments/njpab/about_dropbox_mirror_reddit_bot/))  New image: [http://i.imgur.com/NVhSY.png](http://i.imgur.com/NVhSY.png)  *Was this a mistake, or is there a bug? Message [yetanotherx](http://reddit.com/user/yetanotherx)!*
I don't play lame combos in EDH. I play for fun. I avoid the gross players who do at my store
Short answer: you're sort of wrong and you're letting preconceived notions about Oxford and the south in general affect your opinion.   Longer answer: Oxford is a fairly liberal place for Mississippi. Of course there are the booze worshippers and the sex players around, but I imagine you'll find that at many colleges in the SEC.  Oxford is quite a drinking town, I'll give you that. But if you're not interested in that atmosphere it's easy to avoid.  Same goes for the unprotected sex - honestly, I'm not even sure what point you're making with that comment.   As far as the Bible-thumping conservatism you seem to be so afraid of is concerned, Ole Miss is where I accepted and embraced atheism, and I came from a fairly religious family. I guess how much you're exposed to that depends on your major field (I was a Biology major).  I'm a fairly liberal guy but I really enjoyed my time at Ole Miss. I graduated last May and I still have a few friends there.  I go against the majority opinion when it comes to social issues, (Mississippi IS a highly conservative state), but I never felt like that affected my college experience negatively.  Plus there are a lot of liberally minded people you will meet. That all depends on what groups you try to be a part of. It's very important to find something to do with your time other than sleep/stay in your dorm. Go out and meet people.    The last piece of advice I have for you is to approach college with an open mind. If you start at Ole Miss thinking that you'll hate it, don't be surprised if it turns out to be that way.  I feel like that could apply anywhere.
[Sure I did...](http://dickinabox.net/funneh/cartman_wow_poop.gif) [NSFW-ish]
That's insane. Stake that person.
well don't you feel superior to others
Bummerrrr. I hope you find some sweet lovin' while you're here though :p
I prefer the version where Jesus is saying he only took the wheel for a minute (his blood is wine and all of that) and the paramedic telling him to go away.
I love the huge difference of responses on reddit and the minecraftforums. Reddit generally dislikes/questions the idea while MCForums generally likes the idea. I believe the reason is because Reddit is mostly made up of much more mature people while the MCForums are made up mostly of children.
And this is why animals should not be used as entertainment. 
I've read the FAQ, I was more of just looking to get someone telling me that this isn't a bad workout routine as I don't want to do it for a few weeks/months and see no results.
funny to see cnn covering this old story [newsreal covered this back in Feburary... of last year](http://sean-kennedy.livejournal.com/326779.html)
Probably just money. How much ate you looking for?
Well all Scandinavian countries have not messed up massiv dept. The all run small deficits.  Scandinavian countries are pretty free if you dont look at taxes the real intressting thing is that they manage to spend there taxes in a good way. Thats why there econmoies work, if the government would get messed up and government started to misdirect money the would run into problems fast.
I can't call it Marijuana for some reason. 
Ashamed of being upset about infidelity? That's a whole new level of American self-loathing.
You look sexy to me
The entire video was not epic, only parts of it.  False advertising. 
I wish that company would had put a dragonair on that plane...
Oh Reddit, every day you resemble a college campus more and more. Here I am in the lecture theater waiting to discuss world economics and the first person to approach the podium is a drunk who vomits over the mic before passing out. Then as now I wonder 'Why are you here?' 
[A *cuntry* boner?](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=qs5UaHmJXt0)
So very, very tired of Fur Elise.
The worst i got was some middle school girls taping printer paper with " KONY 2012 " hand written in marker on a couple street signs
If you're worried about not having enough money, I spent 7m getting 84-88 with ppots. It's not the fastest xp, but still a good 160k an hour which is better than most skills.
First why the hell does its head move, second why does its penis have a knot, not very realistic! 
&gt; Is it simply that online advertising isn't as lucrative as cable ads?  I never understood why this is. I'm actually sitting through internet ads, but my parents just DVR everything and skip the commercials. It seems like internet ads would be worth more.
I noticed it says "rain or shine".  Has anyone ever seen a drive-in movie in the rain?  Does it effect the projection?
A complete douche = the perfect anti-bitch. Stick around, kid, you might be surprised what you learn!
You're 27. And attractive. Boom.
Perhaps he is trying to keep up with friends who share similar time constraints, but unlike him they have no qualms using the RMAH.
I thought it was a pretty well known quote in r/atheism, it's used all the time. I wasn't trying to claim ownership, just remind people. 
(For our friends outside the USA... 20 feet -&gt; 6.1 m) - Yeehaw!
I don't know what prom you guys go to but most guys my age dress decently, if ill fitting. We do have to wear a tie/blazer etc. (yay, Catholic school!) but still, no clip ons!
It's a passive effect of his Q and E, not his innate ability. Thanks for trying, tho.
Looks like that would hurt
&gt;Maybe they didn't know of the American, cream-filled cake...   oh, they knew.
Your arms?
Go Greendale, go Greendale, [go!](http://i39.tinypic.com/wlpx52.gif)
My aunt has her eyeliner tattooed on, and it's just a cosmetic thing. I thought it was a bad idea, but she justified it by pointing out that she'd been wearing the same exact eyeliner for the past 20 years, and was just sick of putting it on and removing it. She looks fine.
Totally underrated, but my favorite: Ghorbash the Iron Hand. With a badass name, phrases, and voice, he's my fav.
Another issue that is relevant is your right to film.  - [In the US, the constitution protects your right to film and photograph on **public** space.](http://blogs.phillymag.com/the_philly_post/2012/03/29/photograph-cops-public-first-amendment/)   - For stuff like state law, [double check on this site](http://www.citmedialaw.org/legal-guide).   - [Filming a REVOLUTION a Tutorial - Your Camera is your WEAPON. OCCUPY](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=vUMPssUP0bc&amp;feature=my_liked_videos&amp;list=LLiNb4VJqK5K-O9VmsM8Pvcw)  - [Quantitative analysis of online social media in phase one of Occupy Wall Street (OWS Analytics)](https://docs.google.com/presentation/d/1spXu_uuSJXtYKvyWr_MpwXGxW3LCd7_q1HtK4acuS1M/edit#slide=id.p14)
Out*
I don't think Vale is the kind of guy to 'lack motivation' to win but he does seem to be getting frustrated not seeing any progress. I think the 'lack of motivation' idea was just the creation of people trying to figure out why Hayden qualified so much better on the same bike. I hope the rumors will be put to rest after seeing the interviews from the riders. Rossi said Hayden's setup was too hard on the front end, and Hayden said he was losing front end grip when others were just getting their tires up to temp. 
Teachers: "It’s a very intense profession, where you are teaching for five hours a day, and then doing preparation and marking and evaluation,”  Education Board: “So, this has nothing to do with students from a teacher’s point of view. They need their summers off,”  The education board makes a good point, working 5 hours a day and doing evaluation for 3 hours a night? Its almost like working 8 hours a day. Boo fucking hoo.  If you need some added time off, take a sabbatical and let some new teachers in classrooms. Seems like its time for them to clean house on those people who are just cruising till retirement.  IMO: I would much rather take 3x 1 month vacations vs 1x 3 month vacation any day.
I read your crosspost. Don't let the comments there get you down. They don't understand. They have no fucking idea. They live in their fantasy world where everything ends Happily Ever After, The End.  It seems like you know how it works. The extra marital stuff is by no means a fix to your problems. But it does help you take away the frustration/anger so that you can be more patient towards your partner. 
No, the automaton guy.. now im at the sandship, near the end.
This is what happens when you let your kids be insufferable little brats, don't discipline them, and constantly tell them they're a precious little snowflake. They don't learn any respect for other people or their property, and can't distinguish a toilet from an Apple product. I'm just thankful that, for once, the school didn't start screaming about "safety" and have him arrested. It sucks that the school's out 30 computers, and I think the brat's parents should pay for them but I'm not going to hold my breath.
I didn't say it was.  Please quit interpreting everything I say as absolutes.
Fun stream!
Wait, so they are not casting Jojen and Meera for sure...? 
I was there when it was noticed.. That *is* why.. But it doesn't hurt that they're a universal symbol for 'Welcome'.
What happened to Nashville?  It's like a mirror match in Mortal Kombat.. all of a sudden you're fighting yourself, and you don't know yourself well enough to know what your weaknesses are.  Phoenix is out-Predatoring the Preds.
I guess that is my only regret, I could have also done more activities.
&gt;This statement reminds me of a Daily Show skit where Aaasif Mandvi asks a Fox News presenter why she doesn't believe that global warming is real despite all the statistics that prove otherwise. She answered by saying that these statistics are suspicious because they are published by scientists and only other scientists are allowed to review these findings.  I loved that bit.
I am all for Planned Parenthood...  ...but am even more against the goddamned feds fucking in states' business.
Confirming this~ marialux hit the nail on the head pretty much. Not sure why your coworker didn't recognize it, since there's nothing wrong with the 2nd and 3rd words from a Japanese standpoint.
I watch the first six pieces of evidence, then turn off the TV unless they do a ghost episode, where I watch the night time investigation.
Oh man, that's kind of great.... buuuut, no way in hell I'm waking up that early. Not even for cheap mash liquor.
not gonna lie, I found those pink sandals in like 5 seconds.... I think it must be fate.
this is true. I love mine, but damned if it was so expensive. 
Also, when the dragons hatched in the season one finale, there were clearly three dragons with her.
I am totally okay w/ this list.
They are not allergic, per se, but it was the easiest way to explain it in the beginning of this thread. I mostly suffer scarring and burning symptoms on/under the surface of my skin
I am $50,000 in debt from school. That hobo is $0 in debt. Hobo is $50,000 richer than I am. =(
Link to wallpaper?
See, I thought this too, and I felt really bad about it and made a big confession, and he was like "I see no problem here." 
The cat's head was turned towards the turtle the whole time. I don't think it was expecting it to bite his ass, but that's life.
Hyper 212 Plus is right in your price range.
Krugman wants our debt to go to 130% of GDP....   Our credit rating was reduced from AA+ to AA because we hit 100%.   The only reason our dollar is not toilet paper is because the world desperately hangs on to it for the world reserve currency.   The credit rating should be much lower but, regardless, the minute the world starts to lose confidence in our dollar (i.e. like the housing bubble), the entire foundation of the U.S. economy will collapse.   Just remember, Krugman did not predict the housing bubble.   Ron Paul did in 2002.
How did you beat anyone like that?
You know what would be nice here? A HR.  EDIT: Or an atrocious error.
I actually learned on Mormon Expression that tithing settlment is optional.  Jon and Zilpha Larson stopped going to tithing settlment years before they stopped paying tithing.  Their rational was that the bishop was busy so why burdon him with one extra meeting.   Now that being said, virtually all members go to tithing settlment.  Another loophole that I found out when I was at BYU is that you can pay your tithing directly to SLC.  You don't have to do it through your ward.   The only required tithing verification you have to do is in the temple recommend interview.  But thats on your honor. Again almost NO mormons know about this loophole and the church makes no effort to make these things known.  
A real nightmare is if blizzard and valve started working on Starcraft: Ghost.  
I did. Went back and forth over email with Rod R.  Really super-cool guy..I got his help to 'nudge' Brent Spiner. Who emailed only once but was nice / complimented.
Not to be "that guy," but the lone wanderer has a normal dog. The Courier has a cyborg.
Trips/Taker and Rock over Cena just seemed like the WWE telling the fans the Attitude Era is superior to the current product. The exact opposite of what a wrestling company (even one by any other name) should be doing. The D-Bry squash was a fucking travesty, and if I hadn't paid for the event I would have quit watching right then. Only the fans' visceral reaction to that has saved D-Bry from mid-card hell, IMO, and who knows how long that will hold. Kane/Orton was pointless. The Diva's celebrity match was, again, a fucking travesty with a legitimately injured Maria Menunous, who added precisely ZERO buys, pinning the *Diva's Champion* clean...for fuck's sake. Punk/Jericho was a fine match with a dumb stipulation added at the last second and a finish that was baffling in that Jericho's return seemed wasted. A month later and I'm wondering why Jericho is still on my TV. Is beating the same over the hill superstar over and over really doing anything to build up Punk?
I'll say 7-8 for darksiders and L4D and I'm not really sure for LA Noire, I think I'd take a buds for it. I really have no idea though so if that doesn't sound reasonable say so.
I've never found a good way to terminate a strip of dragonscale, and never had the courage to try to make it continuous.
Ah right.. or beer?
This. Personallysave for recon I find supprssion to be fine, but most don't so whatever. Tone it down.   However, do not putus back to prepatch levels, it was fucking worthless.
Cool cake, sucks that you couldn't win on your birthday.  Good luck for game 3!
Girl Interrupted??
While I think many, many mistakes have been made in the war on terror, and that torturing any POWs was very very wrong and illegal, he does kind of have a point...  If you kill the suspected terrorists with hellfire missiles instead of capturing them there is no chance for that person to exist any longer or to confess or provide intelligence. At least as a prisoner at gitmo there is a (small) chance a POW could be freed again someday if the "war" were ever to end. Whereas death is irreversible.  I think maybe more innocent people get killed by the drone fired missiles also because everyone in the house or bunker or whatever dies.  However, if certain  Japanese POWs could be charged for water boarding Americans in WW2 this guy and others involved should have been charged with war crimes for what they did. In fact after WW2 the guilty were sentenced to death by hanging!
I like mine light so I skip the weights.  :]
I find it unfortunate that your personal experience with the site is being buried by the circlejerk.  Nevertheless, I consistently have problems with VODs.  Just today I've tried to watch several videos from a recent tournament in both Firefox and Chrome, and I couldn't get them to play.  Some have worked just fine in both browsers, though.
Oh. In front and behind of the target relative to the player's sight. Really confusing way to say that. Why would you even think of it that way? Better to involve everyone's trajectory in your mental calculations.
[Lina...You Hellfire Hell Bitch.](http://www.dota2wiki.com/images/7/72/Cm_lina_10.mp3)
I wtf'ed so hard
They technically already have that in CLG.eu. Altho im not sure of any scrim results between those teams i think the .eu team might be stronger lately.
Right, I was just explaining where OP's confusion may have stemmed from.
You have to do a driver workaround to keep the overclocking ability on 78-- cards, however.  Just keep that in mind.
I don't think the trinity is ever hinted at in the Hebrew bible. Jews generally think that splitting God up like that is blasphemous, since there is only one true God.  The Messiah was not intended to be a literal son of God. He was supposed to be a non-divine, regular human being; a figurative "son of God" just like David was described in the Hebrew bible.  The trinity is sort of a later invention intended to justify the monotheistic Christian religion. It came about in the 2nd century and was prevalent among the proto-orthodox Christians who later made it official with in their creeds when the Catholic Church was established in the 4th century, and their Christian theology became "orthodox".
Off the top of my head:   Virginity (or supposed virginity) doesn't guarantee it's going to be your kid. "Mama's baby, Papa's maybe." Plus, how long have we even remotely understood genetics (my seed in her womb = my baby)?   It would be better to sequester your woman/women from all of the other males, but we typically lived in groups and raised children in groups back in the day.   Under the age of 18, women's bodies are still growing (pubic bones, body fat, nutrition) and they're more likely to have preeclampsia (very bad news). Younger mothers = inferior babies, dead babies, and dead mothers.   &amp; IIRC we didn't die in our thirties (you said this somewhere else), it's just that many more people died before they reached adulthood and that skews the average life expectancy. 
Woot woot, Chaska ent here!
If you have some good classic 'thane wheels, and an ability to shift your weight well, you can slide on almost any type of board! As for freestyle tricks, I have a cruising style deck (kind of like a pintail, but 36", and with a kick tail and wheel cutouts in the front), and I can do all kinds of manuals, and although because of the weight I can't really Ollie on flatground, I can pop off of curbs and two-sets. Don't let the type of board limit you, take what you have and make the best of it! I was convinced for a long time that I would have to buy a new setup for tricks, but after lots of riding, adapting, and practice, I proved myself wrong within a short period of time.
Ok so I agree it is a small sample. He will do better as should the rest of the team. What I mean is do we really need more outfielders? Who is in the minors that can come into the bullpen and help? Maybe Richards? 
I love that 'fresh' smell that only the coasts of Slovenia can offer.
Going to back you up on this. Totally correct that violence was essential to the civil rights movement.  But I think the direct action should be taken against you and your kind, not targets of vandalism.
I'll bet my next paycheck your wife will enjoy it if you order her around...just a thought
Go ass-fuck yourself with a cactus. Skyrim is best
I wanna see this get so deep that you cant see the original gopher anymore lol
Kielbasa fest. 
For some reason when I read "Red box" I thought "RedTube"... it was still funny.
No matter how awesome my character is other npc characters always say things like "She sent you? I guess you'll do for now" pisses me off.
Hmm, how long did it take anyone to match the tea party in terms of either noise or organizing? Occupy has matched the noise, but it remains to be seen how well-organized it is. And that's the point, is that this is happening in 2012 and that was 2009. In case you haven't noticed, "Blue Dogs" are practically an extinct species in the South and an endangered species in the rest of the country.
Then wait until you get home. 
I like her strong stance on environmental issues.
I think this is somewhere in the TCP Header.
eventually you just want things to belong to a set, in case it is uncountable and you want the most general case, then you don't even know what 1 is
It was $400 per month,  Or $10,000 for the 2 years.   I saved up the money by the time i was about 15.  It was a little bit of a sacrifice but I got to meet some amazing people and see some amazing things.   I also learned a lot about life, religion, and my self.   Tl;dr ;  It was worth Every penny
Was the course training you for specifically federal positions? Because federal resumes are expected to be long (on USAjobs.gov, the average resume is 5 to 6 pages). Unfortunately that resume length is too long for practically everything else. This was a painful lesson for me after I had left graduate school for public policy, and was scrambling for *something* to do, so you're not alone in the disappointment. However, it is easily cured with practice. Just cut, cut, cut anything that looks redundant.  Also, while it is painful for anyone to cut down their own writing -- even novelists feel like they're "killing their babies" when they delete items -- the more often you check your resume, you will find yet another way to say the same thing in fewer words.  For example, the list of tools can be eliminated entirely. Your proficiency in that huge array of tools is already implied in your five years of experience as an aviation mechanic. FIVE YEARS. I can't get that experience through school! "Five years of experience in aviation mechanics" should be in the summary, loud and proud.  Edit: grammar.
Not only that, but it's waiting for him when he graduates....in 9 months.
You'd rather be looked down upon while at home for being a douche then?  Ok.  Mission accomplished.
go have a banana and a smile.
&gt;Now maybe you can see why people loathe it. Let's go back to the original example. You're playing your favorite game at 75Hz refresh and 100FPS. You turn VSync on, and the game limits you to 75FPS. No problem, right? Fixed the tearing issue, it looks better. You get to an area that's particularly graphically intensive, an area that would drop your FPS down to about 60 without VSync. Now your card cannot do the 75FPS it was doing before, and since VSync is on, it has to do the next highest one on the list, which is 37.5FPS. So now your game which was running at 75FPS just halved it's framerate to 37.5 instantly. Whether or not you find 37.5FPS smooth doesn't change the fact that the framerate just cut in half suddenly, which you would notice. This is what people hate about it.  http://hardforum.com/showthread.php?t=928593
Whatever gave you the idea that I would lie about shitting myself in public?
I googled that *really* hoping that that was the real name of a ship.
La version que j'ai apprise est :  « ...Accoure à **nos** mâles accents  Que **nos** ennemis expirants... »  Et ça me semble assez cohérent : c'est le chant de guerre de l'Armée du Rhin, donc de soldats partant au combat.  On m'a appris une erreur ?
Fuck the haters, so long as you check it for nicks, cracks and blemishes. Is that 8 speed dura ace? I have that on my bike.
Truly? Wow. I have never heard a guy complain about it before. 
You haven't lived until you've driven recklessly through a school zone.
I had considered it, but I felt Phoenix Rising was more Death than thrash. To add to your list of suggestions, I should think Ketzer has a place on that list.
Toxic Holocaust  Skeletonwitch  Destroyer 666  Sodom
No I was just asking because I also got Mastitis and was prescribed an antibiotic. I asked the doctor if it was a breastfeeding-safe drug and he said "Oh you're still nursing?" DUH where do you think I got the effing mastitis? So anyway, I told him never mind, asked the pharmacist and he told me immediately "Yup this is safe."   I just know first-hand there are a lot of mis-informed docs out there. Sorry for what your wife went through that sounds brutal. As for failure... having doctors give your wrong info (not that it happened in your case) does not a failure make in my opinion.
i hope you enjoy your next decade of beatings you fucking athiest. shes in hell right now getting waterboarded by gods semen
The linked article is very weak, so I'm not interested in spending a lot of time digging through his archives. If you have a specific link for me I would be happy to read it.
I'm 21, in college and yes, I do watch porn.  I don't personally feel that this is a problem, neither have any of my girlfriends.  However,  if I was dating someone and they had a problem with it, I would stop.  I guess I could see myself forgetting a few times... Bottom line:  I feel that if all other things are going well you should let this go if you can.  If you can't...try to give him some time.  Pron has probably been at least semi-habitual for most guys I know since middle school.
sure. wait crap i just remembered im doing ruby with another trade. would you do it without it?
I'm torn. It's so hard to "do the right thing" when the other side lies almost 100% of the time they speak and spread propaganda and disinformation.
I can agree to some extent. Some of their uptempo beats and guitar parts definitely didn't fit the image. The singer was definitely not my cup of tea, but he was on point the whole time so I had to give him credit.
Yep. The tin smell is not as pleasant as PA-kinda lemonish- but it burns similarly, and has a great flavor.   I've smoked equal amounts of both, and I have to say CH is my number one OTC pipe tobacco.  I use both to break in all my non-coated pipes, since neither blend does any serious ghosting.
He didn't use a filter, he made it from scratch. That's how the hell he got first place!
I tried flirting with my cashier the other day at Target. It was like I had just complimented a zombie.
Oh, I absolutely agree. Just off the top of my head: 1. Game times will need to be drastically shortened, as expecting the average person to consistently devote up to a whole hour for a single game is unreasonable 2. Stats and item effects need to be made clearer, so that a person can easily design a build without consulting an online guide 3. Balance between levels needs to be more balanced. In LoL, one of the hardest parts of getting friends to try the game and play with you is that the matchmaking puts them against level 20+ players, all of whom have runes which give them a huge advantage over new players in addition to their experience playing the game. This leads to the new player becoming frustrated at the game, especially after they are inevitably bitched out by their teammates. Which leads to: 4. The community. Jesus. The communities on these games are terrible. Most hyper-competitive gamers on the planet. I'm honestly not sure how they could fix this one. Perhaps by reducing team size and thus encouraging playing more with friends who are less likely to scream at you than online strangers? The competitive nature of the games will naturally draw this type of player, but their presence makes it difficult to attract other, less intense players.  All of these, and I'm sure many more, would absolutely need to be adjusted before the genre is moved into the mainstream. However (with the exception of #4), I see no reason why someone COULDN'T design a game like this, in which new players could easily integrate themselves and learn the game mechanics. Current MOBA games have proven that there certainly is a market and an interest in the genre, and they are the furthest thing in the world from noob-friendly. While it is by no means a certainty that these games will become extremely popular (far from it), I don't think it's likely that the genre to expand with a bit of tweaking to the traditional formula, especially given DOTA 2's impending release. How far this type of game has come from being a simple mod to a major cash cow for RIOT games (and presumably soon Valve) is very impressive.
5 seconds on gold can get you killed fast when you can't cloak.
What the fuck,my birthday,really?
That's disgusting.  There are elderly people sending this asshole their life savings because he preaches that Jesus wants them to.  Somebody please put this con artist in prison.
You clearly don't have very close friends you've known for half your life. We talk about everything.
That would eliminate the Big Ruckus as a scooter though, and it clearly is one.
same here
[Yes?](http://i.imgur.com/aJd2K.png)
Speaking as a native New Yorker, the "town" that all other places are "out of", I've been viewing this thread with some interest. 
Looks like watermelon to me too. I've had my fair share of watermelons in the "what did I throw in my compost pile thats growing now?" game.
Thanks.  I thought for sure my membership to this subreddit would be terminated!
Don't ask me why I remember this too. The internet has ruined me:  http://www.reddit.com/r/IAmA/comments/kcl6m/iama_guy_who_made_thousands_of_dollars_selling/
&gt;protect a lucky few — while leaving everyone else high and dry.  That's also how communism functions. 
have a seat right here
i remember reading about his experiments on children a while ago.  the wikipedia article doesn't mention anything about the long term results, but if i recall i believe the children were all supposed to have ended up completely screwed up in the head.
Ah Malazan, how many years do you think that would take to film?
If you want them to stop flaming you just say ok to everything they say. Most of the time the first or second ok will get them to stop talking. That's what I do rather than continue arguing with them.
By recruits I mean that it's not difficult to get a contract for guaranteed ATC. After basic you go to the 334th training at Keesler AFB and do sims and basic rules (.65 and AFI 13-204) for about 5 months, the you go to your first base and enter OJT for 8-24 months depending on the traffic level and facility type.   If you go tower, you get your CTO cert once you're checked out in Local, Ground and Data. RAPCON(TRACON) is handled differently, but I've never done it so I don't know much about it.  The OJT washout rate here at SKF is about 50%, but none of our trainees ever did a CTI program, so YMMV.
I'm 26. I squeal like a toddler when I see bunnies. I now own a 4mo old mini holland lop. I still squeal. Also, I have no children, but I can and do sing the Blues Clues mail song every day at work when I see the courier. Yes, I do the dance too. Yes, I'm a pretty awesome nurse. 
Definitely give this a try, I've been doing it for years for friends.
Sorry, it's actually referring to [[*this*]](http://www.reddit.com/r/guns/comments/sz0c4/i_love_my_new_p6_but_this_bugs_the_shit_of_out_me/), a previous post of mine.
Oh Great Ron Paul Vs Establishment Evil Paul.  Keep putting them dipshits in the trashcan; all they can do is talk over you.
Your dad probably isn't talking to you because he doesn't want to say anything to hurt you. He's probably more pissed at himself, because he should have known better than to put a teenager who thinks he's invincible behind the wheel of a Porsche. 
don't smoke sugar. just don't do it.
I got your back.
I suppose this isn't very shocking for me because I live in Iowa. Everyone has goats. So sick of goats...
There would always be ways to unblock or at least, have an access to TPB and it would come very soon. Over the internet, there is no absolute blockage for everyone.
fuck it.. try it.. 
If you eat at either of these fine establishments order your sandwich with sliced bananas on it.
desert camo in a wilderness environment isn't very helpful. Besides, those bandits generally stay near the coast. There's a huge continent besides the coast.
Whenever i get a whiff of the dankness in public, I instantly perk up and say "I feel a disturbance in the force" 
The ice cream cones and ice cream are not littering. They are made entirely from organic edible items which will literally disappear within less than a week.  The paper though, yes, that would be considering littering. But you should seriously choose your battles. Two thin paper "holders" are not a serious issue. For one thing paper is bio-degradable. For another thing they are perhaps the most innocent and least damaging item which could possibly be considered "litter". 
Eh, 20 bucks for this is okay, I'll get a copy for my birthday :-).
No totally I do agree. I guess I tried to give him the benefit of the doubt, and I probably didn't act as maturely as I told myself I was.  I've basically removed him from my existence and it is completely his loss, if he ends up with her it will be one rocky road and I'm already moving on.   But I do very much appreciate the alternative opinion because you are absolutely right. Meh, should've just realized it was that easy to cut him out from the beginning. I try too hard to smooth out conflict since I'm usually quite avid at avoiding it.
http://verzend.be/kaybgjpcwo53/Social_Psychological_and_Personality_Science-2012-Saslow-1948550612444137.pdf.html  I totally have no idea how that got there
* Mitch Hedberg
Why would you even take Art History?
In any case, without religion (and the idiotic belief on the part of the perpetrators that they'd spend eternity with 72 virgins) there'd have been no 9/11.
Smoking underneath the sign would have been rebellious.
I think it's cringe-worthy to see Nintendo announce a purple console and see the "gaming community" cry about it saying "it's so gay" or "it looks like Barney" etc. It's like the GameCube all over again.  Idiots don't even realize there's a long history of purple Nintendo gear. It's a signature thing for them, and I think it looks pretty badass. Bunch of 12-year-olds need to get off my internets.
Honestly, I'd recommend getting a cheap cheap cheap motel or hostel room. That way, you can shower and change in privacy. You would also be able to store your clothes there. You wouldn't want to show up at in interview carrying clothes would you?   Where you could find one? I have not a clue. Sorry.
Add me on XBL. I'll be on in a bit.
It's hard to get those cloths in the tiny crevices, such as between the breech and the top strap.  Maybe if you were to cut one up into a small patch or strip and use a pick to tug it in and out of that gap...
Good, uplifting relationship advice there, I'll keep that in mind.  I've lost count on how many "miracle cures" I've been recommended (all in good faith of course) and tried the last four years, so I'm naturally pretty sceptical. :P But one could always benefit from eating more fruit and vegetables, so perhaps I'll give it a shot.  Thank you for your interest and reply.
I think you two should kiss
[Good Evening, Sir](http://i.imgur.com/VR5lp.png)
He said he wasn't serious about that.  He's a normal really horny adolescent teen. I had a sister too and I remember my mind going to some very inappropriate places. We used to give each other massages and there was always a little odd tension there (although it never went further).
Seriously. Link please? :D
Blazing hot blood.
Thanks.
I love comics for just this reason. 
i think depending on what you have on your homepage, it shouldn't hurt you too much and if you're homepage is content sparse, the additional lines of text should outweight any loss in linkjuice being dispersed by the additional links.   Are you talking about 5 links that get rotated based on new posting or are you talking about a shitload of stuff just continuously being added? If it's just a few, i think it's an ok thing to have.  if you're worried about it, nofollow those links and you can retain most of the linkjuice on your homepage.
bro
But he pointed out it is a repost. A repost man! Think of the children.  Anybody that has never read the story is clearly a bad redditor and does not deserve to read the story.   (That is my long sarcastic version of saying, "This.")
But it did, didn't it?  The claims seem to have reasonable citation, and Wasdin didn't challenge any of them.  Was he really removed from the team?  Because of so, it's difficult to imagine a more pure act of compromising team integrity.
Any reason you are going with an AMD processor over an i3?  If this is strictly gaming the i3 will perform better.  If you want the extra cores for something else, though, the 960T might be a good choice.  You will also want a better PSU.  Stick to one that can be found on the Recommended PSU thread found on the right sidebar ----&gt;  This is what I would do if I were you.  It will give you much better performance:  [PCPartPicker part list](http://pcpartpicker.com/p/7yC5) / [Price breakdown by merchant](http://pcpartpicker.com/p/7yC5/by_merchant/) / [Benchmarks](http://pcpartpicker.com/p/7yC5/benchmarks/)  Type|Item|Price :----|:----|:---- **CPU** | [Intel Core i3-2120 3.3GHz Dual-Core Processor](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/intel-cpu-bx80623i32120) | $114.99 @ Newegg  **Motherboard** | [ASRock H61M-VS Micro ATX  LGA1155 Motherboard](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/asrock-motherboard-h61mvs) | $54.99 @ Newegg  **Memory** | [Corsair XMS3 8GB (2 x 4GB) DDR3-1333 Memory](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/corsair-memory-cmx8gx3m2a1333c9) | $35.78 @ NCIX US  **Hard Drive** | [Seagate Barracuda 500GB 3.5" 7200RPM Internal Hard Drive](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/seagate-internal-hard-drive-st500dm002) | $69.99 @ NCIX US  **Video Card** | [XFX Radeon HD 6870 1GB Video Card](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/xfx-video-card-hd687azhfc) | $149.99 @ NCIX US  **Case** | [NZXT Source 210 (Black) ATX Mid Tower Case](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/nzxt-case-s210001) | $39.99 @ Newegg  **Power Supply** | [OCZ 500W ATX12V / EPS12V Power Supply](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/ocz-power-supply-ocz500sxs2) | $19.98 @ NCIX US  **Optical Drive** | [LG GH22NS90B DVD/CD Writer](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/lg-optical-drive-gh22ns90b) | $16.99 @ Newegg   | | **Total**  | Prices include shipping and discounts when available. | $502.70  | Generated by PCPartPicker 2012-04-30 19:59 EDT-0400 |  If you want to see the performance comparison between the 6770 (which is just a rebranded 5770, they have virtually the same performance and specs) and the 6870, you can check em out [here](http://www.anandtech.com/bench/Product/296?vs=290).  Reply or PM me if you have any questions on the decisions I made.
wow.
[NSFW](http://i.imgur.com/TJVvZ.jpg)
One uses cheddar, the other doesn't?
You handled the situation pretty well, but I'm not sure if I'd call it great game.  At the end of the day you never closed, you just pissed her off.  I'll act like a dick to girls for a while, but when I get the sense that they're starting to honestly get mad and are no longer having a good time, I switch it over and become more playful.  What NickTDS said is pretty accurate, you gotta break the "bitch tension" eventually, cause she sure as hell won't.
I use an airsoft pistol. Got tired of shouting "Clear! Clear! All Clear!" so I set up stuffed animals around the house, with cardboard body armor so I can go for head shots.  Now I get to shout, "Tango down! Tango down! Clear! Clear!"
"China Inf, is for noobs"
I use a program called [Little Sound DJ (LSDJ)](http://littlesounddj.com/lsd/) that lets me write music on the Game Boy.  I have a USB cart that I load the program onto, pop it into the Game Boy and you have an instant 8-bit music station.  You can load samples into LSDJ as well, which is why there are vocal snippets, pianos, etc, though the Game Boy crushes them down to 4 bit samples, haha.  So everything you hear is coming from one original Nintendo Game Boy.  It's super fun if you like 8-bit sounds.  
What woman is holding the same job as those billionaires that was paid less than a man?
Oh I just realized that I can pay anything I want for it. Let me go get my debit card :D
Do it! A lot of guys (myself included) are big fans of Drew Estate.
the k nearly looks like balls.  making karma look like a dong /dong.
So could a pen.
As a religious person, I concur and I think the article is spot-on. I am "generous" in a very methodical way - I tithe, and I have specific charities I have researched and approve of that get my money. Because of this, I am less likely to be emotionally swayed by a particular video/person/whatever. I go about my giving in a very rational way. Does this mean I wouldn't stop by the road to help someone? Absolutely not. But I do think someone who does not have a system of giving regularly may be more easily "guilted" into giving money or assistance on a purely emotional basis.
shopped as balls
Five interceptions.  Three for touchdowns.  If it were ever close to a decent comeback, this might be the case.
I got rid of mine 2 months in, after my LO's tongue tie was fixed.
&gt;I don't get aggressive frequently, and during arguments, it was a source of frustration for her that I become a cold, rational, slow-speaking person rather than blowing up like she does.  That is something that always gets me about other people, especially women.  When I am having an argument with someone else, I think through it logically and slowly, trying to find a rational way to come to an agreement/solution.  The other party almost always not only is angry and either yelling or on the verge of it, but even more infuriated by the fact that I am not angry.  They will scream furiously, I will wait my turn, only to be interrupted halfway through my thought.  The way I have always seen it, is showing anger is the first step to admitting that you are losing an argument.  Kinda off topic, but still felt the need to share.
Mine was the size of a grain of sand and it HURT. That looks like Death incarnate.
Probably costs $20, so don't get too excited.
Male, female, female. Not too bad
Yeah, but did you see how nice and bright and healthy-looking Tim Curry's teeth are in that one? Makes perfect sense to have a dental mascot encouraging kids to take that level of good care of their teeth, and there's no better way to do it than by looking like IT itself!  Also, I noticed the German on the poster next to it; was this somewhere in Germany or Austria, OP?
Our ridiculous hot dog just isn't enough eh? Gotta go for dessert. 
Source?  Because I'm pretty sure that this is just plain incorrect.   You prostate exam comment up there is also misleading, as many doctors do, at the very least, request an exam.
There were dozens of major political parties even before America was discovered.
You mean 1981 to 28%.
The damage is dealt before you regain control of your hero
Better yet something minty (scented oils etc). Also props to mynameistux for the water.
That was bad. And you should feel bad.
Rofl the chat bubble is coming from her chest.
